BASIC PHYSICS OF NUCLEAR MEDICINE
By Kieran Maher and other Wikibooks contributors.
From Wikibooks,
the open-content textbooks collection
© Copyright 2004–2006, Wikibooks contributors. This book is published by Wikibooks contributors.
Permission is granted to copy, distribute and/or modify this document under the terms of the GNU Free
Documentation License, Version 1.2 or any later version published by the Free Software Foundation; with no
Invariant Sections, no Front-Cover Texts, and no Back-Cover Texts. A copy of the license is included in the
section entitled "GNU Free Documentation License".
Image licenses are listed in the section entitled "Image Credits."
Authors: KieranMaher, Anonymous, The Doc, Paul Lynch, Derbeth, Jguk, Hagindaz, Yes, Willy on Wheels
bought a Macbook, enjoy Willy OS X!, Wereon
Cover: Scheme of an atom, designed by Miraceti, and licensed under the GFDL.
The current version of this Wikibook may be found at:
http://en.wikibooks.org/wiki/Basic_Physics_of_Nuclear_Medicine
Contents
INTRODUCTION........................................................................................................................3
EXTERNAL LINKS....................................................................................................................3
CHAPTERS..............................................................................................................................4
01. Atomic & Nuclear Structure............................................................................................................4
02. Radioactive Decay.........................................................................................................................11
03. The Radioactive Decay Law......................................................................................................... 20
04. Units of Radiation Measurement...................................................................................................32
05. Interaction of Radiation with Matter.............................................................................................37
06. Attenuation of Gamma-Rays.........................................................................................................42
07. Gas-Filled Radiation Detectors..................................................................................................... 55
08. Scintillation Detectors................................................................................................................... 63
09. Nuclear Medicine Imaging Systems..............................................................................................75
10. Production of Radioisotopes......................................................................................................... 90
CHAPTER REVIEW.................................................................................................................94
ABOUT THE BOOK............................................................................................................... 101
History & Document Notes...............................................................................................................101
Authors, Bibliography, & Image Credits.......................................................................................... 102
GNU Free Documentation License................................................................................................... 103
Introduction
Nuclear Medicine is a fascinating application of nuclear physics. This wikibook is intended to
support a basic introductory course in an early semester of an undergraduate program. It assumes that
students have completed decent high school programs in maths and physics and are concurrently taking
subjects in the medical sciences.
External Links
• Australian & New Zealand Society of Nuclear Medicine - the main nuclear medicine
society in Australia; there is also a Victorian Branch website.
• Radiation and Us - covers common sources of natural and artificial radiation - in the
environment, in the home, in the workplace and in medicine.
• Society of Nuclear Medicine - the main nuclear medicine society in the USA - describes
what nuclear medicine is and how it relates to other medical imaging modalities. Career
information is also included. 
Chapter 1
CHAPTER 1 ATOMIC & NUCLEAR STRUCTURE
Introduction
ou will have encountered much of what we will cover here in your high
school physics. We are going to review this material again below so as to set
the context for subsequent chapters. This chapter will also provide you with an
opportunity to check your understanding of this topic.
Y
The chapter covers atomic structure, nuclear structure, the classification of nuclei,
binding energy and nuclear stability.
live version
discussion
edit lesson
comment
report an error
ask a question
Atomic Structure
The atom is considered to be the basic building block of all matter. A simple theory of the atom
tells us that it consists of two components: a nucleus surrounded by an electron cloud. The situation can
be considered as being similar in some respects to planets orbiting the sun.
From an electrical point of view, the nucleus is said to be positively charged and the electrons
negatively charged.
From a size point of view, the radius of an atom is about 10-10 m while the radius of a nucleus is
about 10-14 m, i.e. about ten thousand times smaller. The situation could be viewed as something like a
cricket ball, representing the nucleus, in the middle of a sporting arena with the electrons orbiting
somewhere around where the spectators would sit. This perspective tells us that the atom should be
composed mainly of empty space. However, the situation is far more complex than this simple picture
portrays in that we must also take into account the physical forces which bind the atom together.
Chemical phenomena can be thought of as interactions between the electrons of individual atoms.
Radioactivity on the other hand can be thought of as changes which occur within the nuclei of
atoms.
The Nucleus
A simple description of the nucleus tells us that it is composed of protons and neutrons. These two
particle types are collectively called nucleons, i.e. particles which inhabit the nucleus.
From a mass point of view the mass of a proton is roughly equal to the mass of a neutron and each
of these is about 2,000 times the mass of an electron. So most of the mass of an atom is concentrated in
the small region at its core.
From an electrical point of view the proton is positively charged and the neutron has no charge. An
atom all on its own (if that were possible to achieve!) is electrically neutral. The number of protons in
4 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Atomic & Nuclear Structure
the nucleus of such an atom must therefore equal the number of electrons orbiting that atom.
Classification of Nuclei
The term Atomic Number is defined in nuclear physics as the number of protons in a nucleus and
is given the symbol Z. From your chemistry you will remember that this number also defines the
position of an element in the Periodic Table of Elements.
Click HERE to access an interactive webpage which gives details of elements in the Periodic
Table.
The term Mass Number is defined as the number of nucleons in a nucleus, that is the number of
protons plus the number of neutrons, and is given the symbol A.
Note that the symbols here are a bit odd, in that it would prevent some confusion if the Atomic
Number were given the symbol A, and the Mass Number were given another symbol, such as M, but its
not a simple world!
It is possible for nuclei of a given element to have the same number of protons but differing
numbers of neutrons, that is to have the same Atomic Number but different Mass Numbers. Such nuclei
are referred to as Isotopes. All elements have isotopes and the number ranges from three for hydrogen
to over 30 for elements such as caesium and barium.
Chemistry has a relatively simple way of classifying the different elements by the use of symbols
such as H for hydrogen, He for helium and so on. The classification scheme used to identify different
isotopes is based on this approach with the use of a superscript before the chemical symbol to denote
the Mass Number along with a subscript before the chemical symbol to denote the Atomic Number. In
other words an isotope is identified as:
where X is the chemical symbol of the element.
Let us take the case of hydrogen as an example. It has three isotopes:
• the most common one consisting of a single proton orbited by one electron,
• a second isotope consisting of a nucleus containing a proton and a neutron orbited by one
electron,
• a third whose nucleus consists of one proton and two neutrons, again orbited by a single
electron.
A simple illustration of these isotopes is shown below. Remember though that this is a simplified
illustration given what we noted earlier about the size of a nucleus compared with that of an atom. But
the illustration is nevertheless useful for showing how isotopes are classified.
Wikibooks | 5
Chapter 1
Click HERE for an animated version of this figure.
The first isotope commonly called hydrogen has a Mass Number of 1, an Atomic Number of 1
and hence is identified as:
The second isotope commonly called deuterium has a Mass Number of 2, an Atomic Number of 1
and is identified as:
The third isotope commonly called tritium is identified as:
The same classification scheme is used for all isotopes. For example, you should now be able to
figure out that the uranium isotope, , contains 92 protons and 144 neutrons.
A final point on classification is that we can also refer to individual isotopes by giving the name of
the element followed by the Mass Number. For example, we can refer to deuterium as hydrogen-2 and
we can refer to
as uranium-236.
Before we leave this classification scheme let us further consider the difference between chemistry
and nuclear physics. You will remember that the water molecule is made up of two hydrogen atoms
bonded with an oxygen atom. Theoretically if we were to combine atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in
this manner many, many of billions of times we could make a glass of water. We could also make our
glass of water using deuterium instead of hydrogen. This second glass of water would theoretically be
very similar from a chemical perspective. However, from a physics perspective our second glass would
6 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Atomic & Nuclear Structure
be heavier than the first since each deuterium nucleus is about twice the mass of each hydrogen
nucleus. Indeed water made in this fashion is called heavy water.
Atomic Mass Unit
The conventional unit of mass, the gram, is rather large for use in describing characteristics of
nuclei. For this reason, a special unit called the Atomic Mass Unit (amu) is often used. This unit is
sometimes defined as 1/12th of the mass of the stable most commonly occurring isotope of carbon, i.e.
12C. In terms of grams, 1 amu is equal to 1.66 x 10-24 g, that is, just over one million, million, million
millionth of a gram.
The masses of the proton, mp
 and neutron, mn
 on this basis are:
m
p
 = 1.00783 amu
and
mn
 = 1.00866 amu
while that of the electron is just 0.00055 amu.
Binding Energy
We are now in a position to consider the subject of nuclear stability. From what we have covered
so far, we have seen that the nucleus is a tiny region in the centre of an atom and that it is composed of
neutrally and positively charged particles. So, in a large nucleus such as that of uranium (Z=92) we
have a large number of positively charged protons concentrated into a tiny region in the centre of the
atom. An obvious question which arises is that with all these positive charges in close proximity, how
come the nucleus does not fly apart? How can a nucleus remain as an entity with such electrostatic
repulsion between the components? Should the orbiting negatively-charged electrons not attract the
protons away from the nucleus?
Let us take the case of the helium-4 nucleus as an example. This nucleus contains two protons and
two neutrons so that in terms of amu we can figure out from what we covered earlier that the
mass of 2 protons = 2.01566 amu,
and the
mass of 2 neutrons = 2.01732 amu.
Therefore we would expect the total mass of the nucleus to be 4.03298 amu.
The experimentally determined mass of a helium-4 nucleus is a bit less - just 4.00260 amu. In
other words there is a difference of 0.03038 amu between what we might expect as the mass of this
Wikibooks | 7
Chapter 1
nucleus and what we actually measure. You might think of this difference as very small at just 0.75%.
But remember that since the mass of one electron is 0.00055 amu the difference is actually equivalent
to the mass of about 55 electrons. Therefore it is significant enough to wonder about.
It is possible to consider that this missing mass is converted to energy which is used to hold the
nucleus together, that is it is converted to a form of energy called the Binding Energy. You could say
like all relationships, energy must be expended in maintaining them!
Like the gram in terms of the mass of nuclei, the common unit of energy, the joule is rather
cumbersome when we consider the energy needed to bind a nucleus together. The unit used to express
energies on the atomic scale is the electron volt, symbol: eV.
One electron volt is defined as the amount of energy gained by an electron as it falls through a
potential difference of one volt. This definition on its own is not of great help to us here and it is stated
purely for the sake of completeness. So do not worry about it for the time being. Just appreciate that it
is a unit representing a tiny amount of energy but an amount nevertheless which is useful on the atomic
scale. It is a bit too small in the case of binding energies however and the mega-electron volt (MeV) is
often used.
Albert Einstein introduced us to the equivalence of mass, m, and energy, E, at the atomic level
using the following equation:
E = m c2
 ,
where c is the velocity of light.
It is possible to show that 1 amu is equivalent to 931.48 MeV. Therefore, the mass difference we
discussed earlier between the expected and measured mass of the helium-4 nucleus of 0.03038 amu is
equivalent to about 28 MeV. This represents about 7 MeV for each of the four nucleons contained in
the nucleus.
Nuclear Stability
In most stable isotopes the binding energy per nucleon lies between 7 and 9 MeV. Since this
binding energy is dependent on the number of nucleons in a nucleus, that is the Mass Number, A, and
since the electrostatic repulsion between the protons is dependent on the square of the charges, that is
Z
2
, it is possible to infer that Z2
 must be dependent on A for a nucleus to remain stable.
In other words to combat the effect of the increase in electrostatic repulsion when the number of
protons increases the number of neutrons must increase more rapidly to contribute sufficient energy to
bind the nucleus together.
As we noted earlier there are a number of isotopes for each element of the Periodic Table. It has
been found that the most stable isotope for each element has a specific number of neutrons in its
nucleus. Plotting a graph of the number of protons against the number of neutrons for these stable
isotopes generates what is called the Nuclear Stability Curve:
8 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Atomic & Nuclear Structure
Note that the number of protons equals the number of neutrons for small nuclei. But notice also
that the number of neutrons increases more rapidly than the number of protons as the size of the
nucleus gets bigger so as to maintain the stability of the nucleus. In other words more neutrons need to
be there to contribute to the binding energy used to counteract the electrostatic repulsion between the
protons.
Radioactivity
There are about 2,450 known isotopes of the one hundred odd elements in the Periodic Table. You
can imagine the size of a table of isotopes relative to that of the Periodic Table! The unstable isotopes
lie above or below the Nuclear Stability Curve. These unstable isotopes attempt to reach the stability
curve by splitting into fragments, in a process called Fission, or by emitting particles and/or energy in
the form of radiation. This latter process is called Radioactivity.
It is useful to dwell for a few moments on the term radioactivity. For example what has nuclear
stability to do with radio? From a historical perspective remember that when these radiations were
discovered about 100 years ago we did not know exactly what we were dealing with. When people like
Henri Becquerel and Marie Curie were working initially on these strange emanations from certain
natural materials it was thought that the radiations were somehow related to another phenomenon
which also was not well understood at the time - that of radio communication. It seems reasonable on
this basis to appreciate that some people considered that the two phenomena were somehow related and
hence that the materials which emitted radiation were termed radio-active.
We know today that the two phenomena are not directly related but we nevertheless hold onto the
term radioactivity for historical purposes. But it should be quite clear to you having reached this stage
of this chapter that the term radioactive refers to the emission of particles and/or energy from unstable
isotopes. Unstable isotopes for instance those that have too many protons to remain a stable entity are
called radioactive isotopes - and called radioisotopes for short. The term radionuclide is also
sometimes used.
Finally about 300 of the 2,450-odd isotopes mentioned above are found in nature. The rest are
man-made (or person-made!), that is they are produced artificially. These 2,150 or so artificial isotopes
have been made during the last 100 years or so with most having been made since the second world
war. Click HERE to access an interactive webpage which gives details of elements in the Periodic
Wikibooks | 9
Chapter 1
Table and of radioisotopes used in medicine.
We will return to the production of radioisotopes in the last chapter of this wikibook and will
proceed for the time being with a description of the types of radiation emitted by radioisotopes.
External Links
• Marie and Pierre Curie and the Discovery of Polonium and Radium - an historical essay
from The Nobel Foundation.
• Natural Radioactivity - an overview of radioactivity in nature - includes sections on
primordial radionuclides, cosmic radiation, human produced radionuclides, as well as natural
radioactivity in soil, in the ocean, in the human body and in building materials - from the
University of Michigan Student Chapter of the Health Physics Society.
• The Particle Adventure - an interactive tour of the inner workings of the atom which
explains the modern tools physicists use to probe nuclear and sub-nuclear matter and how
physicists measure the results of their experiments using detectors - from the Particle Data
Group at the Lawrence Berkeley National Lab, USA and mirrored at CERN, Geneva.
• WebElements - an excellent web-based Periodic Table of the Elements which includes a
vast array of data about each element - originally from Mark Winter at the University of
Sheffield, England.
Multiple Choice Questions
Click HERE to access an online MCQ covering the material in this chapter.
congratulations on completing
CHAPTER 01 • ATOMIC & NUCLEAR STRUCTURE
live version • discussion • edit lesson • comment • report an error • ask a question
10 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Radioactive Decay
CHAPTER 2 RADIOACTIVE DECAY
Introduction
e saw in the last chapter that radioactivity is a process used by unstable
nuclei to achieve a more stable situation. It is said that such nuclei decay in
an attempt to achieve stability. So, an alternative title for this chapter is Nuclear
Decay Processes.
W
live version
discussion
edit lesson
comment
report an error
ask a question
We also saw in the previous chapter that we can use the Nuclear Stability Curve as a means of
describing what is going on. So a second alternative title for this chapter is Methods of Getting onto
the Nuclear Stability Curve.
We are going to follow a descriptive or phenomenological approach to the topic here by describing
in a fairly simple fashion what is known about each of the major decay mechanisms. Once again you
may have already covered this material in high school physics. But bear with us because the treatment
here will help us set the scene for subsequent chapters.
Methods of Radioactive Decay
Rather than considering what happens to individual nuclei it is perhaps easier to consider a
hypothetical nucleus that can undergo many of the major forms of radioactive decay. This hypothetical
nucleus is shown below:
Wikibooks | 11
Chapter 2
Firstly we can see two protons and two neutrons being emitted together in a process called alphadecay. Secondly, we can see that a proton can release a particle in a process called beta-plus decay,
and that a neutron can emit a particle in a process called beta-minus decay. We can also see an
electron being captured by a proton. Thirdly we can see some energy being emitted which results from
a process called gamma-decay as well as an electron being attracted into the nucleus and being ejected
again. Finally there is the rather catastrophic process where the nucleus cracks in half called
spontaneous fission. We will now describe each of these decay processes in turn.
Spontaneous Fission
This is a very destructive process which occurs in some heavy nuclei which split into 2 or 3
fragments plus some neutrons. These fragments form new nuclei which are usually radioactive.
Nuclear reactors exploit this phenomenon for the production of radioisotopes. Its also used for nuclear
power generation and in nuclear weaponry. The process is not of great interest to us here and we will
say no more about it for the time being.
Alpha Decay
In this decay process two protons and two neutrons leave the nucleus together in an assembly
known as an alpha particle. Note that an alpha particle is really a helium-4 nucleus.
So why not call it a helium nucleus? Why give it another name? The answer to this question lies in
the history of the discovery of radioactivity. At the time when these radiations were discovered we
12 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Click HERE for an animated version of this figure.
Radioactive Decay
didn't know what they really were. We found out that one type of these radiations had a double positive
charge and it was not until sometime later that we learnt that they were in fact nuclei of helium-4. In
the initial period of their discovery this form of radiation was given the name alpha rays (and the other
two were called beta and gamma rays), these terms being the first three letters of the Greek alphabet.
We still call this form of radiation by the name alpha particle for historical purposes. Calling it by this
name also contributes to the specific jargon of the field and leads outsiders to think that the subject is
quite specialised!
But notice that the radiation really consists of a helium-4 nucleus emitted from an unstable larger
nucleus. There is nothing strange about helium since it is quite an abundant element on our planet. So
why is this radiation dangerous to humans? The answer to this question lies with the energy with which
they are emitted and the fact that they are quite massive and have a double positive charge. So when
they interact with living matter they can cause substantial destruction to molecules which they
encounter in their attempt to slow down and to attract two electrons to become a neutral helium atom.
An example of this form of decay occurs in the uranium-238 nucleus. The equation which
represents what occurs is:
Here the uranium-238 nucleus emits a helium-4 nucleus (the alpha particle) and the parent nucleus
becomes thorium-234. Note that the Mass Number of the parent nucleus has been reduced by 4 and the
Atomic Number is reduced by 2 which is a characteristic of alpha decay for any nucleus in which it
occurs.
Beta Decay
There are three common forms of beta decay:
(a) Electron Emission
Certain nuclei which have an excess of neutrons may attempt to reach stability by converting a
neutron into a proton with the emission of an electron. The electron is called a beta-minus particle -
the minus indicating that the particle is negatively charged.
We can represent what occurs as follows:
where a neutron converts into a proton and an electron. Notice that the total electrical charge is the
same on both sides of this equation. We say that the electric charge is conserved.
We can consider that the electron cannot exist inside the nucleus and therefore is ejected.
Once again there is nothing strange or mysterious about an electron. What is important though
Wikibooks | 13
Chapter 2
from a radiation safety point of view is the energy with which it is emitted and the chemical damage it
can cause when it interacts with living matter.
An example of this type of decay occurs in the iodine-131 nucleus which decays into xenon-131
with the emission of an electron, that is
The electron is what is called a beta-minus particle. Note that the Mass Number in the above
equation remains the same and that the Atomic Number increases by 1 which is characteristic of this
type of decay.
You may be wondering how an electron can be produced inside a nucleus given that the simple
atomic description we gave in the previous chapter indicated that the nucleus consists of protons and
neutrons only. This is one of the limitations of the simple treatment presented so far and can be
explained by considering that the three fundamental particles which we call protons, neutrons and
electrons are themselves formed of smaller particles called quarks. We are not going to consider these
in any way here other than to note that some combinations of different types of quark produce protons,
another combination produces neutrons and a third combination forms electrons. The message here is
to appreciate that a simple picture is the best way to start in an introductory text such as this and that
the real situation is a lot more complex than what has been described. The same can be said about the
treatment of beta-decay given above as we will see in subsequent chapters.
(b) Positron Emission
When the number of protons in a nucleus is too large for the nucleus to be stable it may attempt to
reach stability by converting a proton into a neutron with the emission of a positively-charged electron.
That is not a typographical error! An electron with a positive charge also called a positron is
emitted. The positron is the beta-plus particle.
The history here is quite interesting. A brilliant Italian physicist, Enrico Fermi developed a theory
of beta decay and his theory predicted that positively-charged as well as negatively-charged electrons
could be emitted by unstable nuclei. These particles could be called pieces of anti-matter and they were
subsequently discovered by experiment. They do not exist for very long as they quickly combine with a
normal electron and the subsequent reaction called annihilation gives rise to the emission of two
gamma rays.
Science fiction writers had a great time following the discovery of anti-matter and speculated
along with many scientists that parts of our universe may contain negatively-charged protons forming
nuclei which are orbited by positively-charged electrons. But this is taking us too far away from the
topic at hand!
The reaction in our unstable nucleus which contains one too many protons can be represented as
follows:
Notice, once again, that electric charge is conserved on each side of this equation.
14 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Radioactive Decay
An example of this type of decay occurs in sodium-22 which decays into neon-22 with the
emission of a positron:
Note that the Mass Number remains the same and that the Atomic Number decreases by 1.
(c) Electron Capture
In this third form of beta decay an inner orbiting electron is attracted into an unstable nucleus
where it combines with a proton to form a neutron. The reaction can be represented as:
This process is also known as K-capture since the electron is often attracted from the K-shell of
the atom.
How do we know that a process like this occurs given that no radiation is emitted? In other words
the event occurs within the atom itself and no information about it leaves the atom. Or does it? The
signature of this type of decay can be obtained from effects in the electron cloud surrounding the
nucleus when the vacant site left in the K-shell is filled by an electron from an outer shell. The filling
of the vacancy is associated with the emission of an X-ray from the electron cloud and it is this X-ray
which provides a signature for this type of beta decay.
This form of decay can also be recognised by the emission of gamma-rays from the new nucleus.
An example of this type of radioactive decay occurs in iron-55 which decays into manganese-55
following the capture of an electron. The reaction can be represented as follows:
Note that the Mass Number once again is unchanged in this form of decay and that the Atomic
Number is decreased by 1.
Gamma Decay
Gamma decay involves the emission of energy from an unstable nucleus in the form of
electromagnetic radiation.
You should remember from your high school physics that electromagnetic radiation is the biggest
physical phenomenon we have so far discovered. The radiation can be characterised in terms of its
frequency, its wavelength and its energy. Thinking about it in terms of the energy of the radiation we
Wikibooks | 15
Chapter 2
have very low energy electromagnetic radiation called radio waves, infra-red radiation at a slightly
higher energy, visible light at a higher energy still, then ultra-violet radiation and the higher energy
forms of this radiation are called X-rays and gamma-rays. You should also remember that these
radiations form what is called the Electromagnetic Spectrum.
Before proceeding it is useful to pause for a moment to consider the difference between X-rays and
gamma-rays. These two forms of radiation are high energy electromagnetic rays and are therefore
virtually the same. The difference between them is not what they consist of but where they come from.
In general we can say that if the radiation emerges from a nucleus it is called a gamma-ray and if it
emerges from outside the nucleus from the electron cloud for example, it is called an X-ray.
One final point is of relevance before we consider the different forms of gamma-decay and that is
what such a high energy ray really is. It has been found in experiments that gamma-rays (and X-rays
for that matter!) sometimes manifest themselves as waves and other times as particles. This waveparticle duality can be explained using the equivalence of mass and energy at the atomic level. When
we describe a gamma ray as a wave it has been found useful to use terms such as frequency and
wavelength just like any other wave. In addition when we describe a gamma ray as a particle we use
terms such as mass and electric charge. Furthermore the term electromagnetic photon is used for these
particles. The interesting feature about these photons however is that they have neither mass nor
charge!
There are two common forms of gamma decay:
16 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Radioactive Decay
(a) Isomeric Transition
A nucleus in an excited state may reach its ground or unexcited state by the emission of a gammaray.
An example of this type of decay is that of technetium-99m - which by the way is the most
common radioisotope used for diagnostic purposes today in medicine. The reaction can be expressed
as:
Here a nucleus of technetium-99 is in an excited state, that is it has excess energy. The excited
state in this case is called a metastable state and the nucleus is therefore called technetium-99m (m for
metastable). The excited nucleus looses its excess energy by emitting a gamma-ray to become
technetium-99.
(b) Internal Conversion
Here the excess energy of an excited nucleus is given to an atomic electron, e.g. a K-shell electron.
Decay Schemes
Decay schemes are widely used to give a visual representation of radioactive decay. A scheme for
a relatively straight-forward decay is shown below:
This scheme is for hydrogen-3 which decays to helium-3 with a half-life of 12.3 years through the
emission of a beta-minus particle with an energy of 0.0057 MeV.
A scheme for a more complicated decay is that of caesium-137:
This isotope can decay through through two beta-minus processes. In one which occurs in 5% of
disintegrations a beta-minus particle is emitted with an energy of 1.17 MeV to produce barium-137. In
the second which occurs more frequently (in the remaining 95% of disintegrations) a beta-minus
particle of energy 0.51 MeV is emitted to produce barium-137m - in other words a barium-137 nucleus
in a metastable state. The barium-137m then decays via isomeric transition with the emission of a
gamma-ray of energy 0.662 MeV.
Wikibooks | 17
Chapter 2
The general method used for decay schemes is illustrated in the diagram below:
The energy is plotted on the vertical axis and atomic number on the horizontal axis - although
these axes are rarely displayed in actual schemes. The isotope from which the scheme originates is
displayed at the top - X in the case above. This isotope is referred to as the parent. The parent looses
energy when it decays and hence the products of the decay referred to as daughters are plotted at a
lower energy level.
The diagram illustrates the situation for common forms of radioactive decay. Alpha-decay is
illustrated on the left where the mass number is reduced by 4 and the atomic number is reduced by 2 to
produce daughter A. To its right the scheme for beta-plus decay is shown to produce daughter B. The
situation for beta-minus decay followed by gamma-decay is shown on the right side of the diagram
where daughters C and D respectively are produced.
External Links
• Basics about Radiation - overview of the different types of ionising radiation from the
18 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Radioactive Decay
Radiation Effects Research Foundation - a cooperative Japan-United States Research
Organization which conducts research for peaceful purposes.
• Radiation and Life - an essay by Eric J Hall, Professor of Radiology, Columbia University
with sections on the unstable atom, ionising radiation, background radiation, man-made
radiation and radioactive decay - from the Uranium Information Centre website.
• Radiation and Radioactivity - a self-paced lesson developed by the University of
Michigan's Student Chapter of the Health Physics Society, with sections on radiation,
radioactivity, the atom, alpha radiation, beta radiation and gamma radiation.
Multiple Choice Questions
Click HERE to access an online MCQ covering the material in this chapter.
congratulations on completing
CHAPTER 02 • RADIOACTIVE DECAY
live version • discussion • edit lesson • comment • report an error • ask a question
Wikibooks | 19
Chapter 3
CHAPTER 3 THE RADIOACTIVE DECAY LAW
Introduction
e covered radioactive decay from a phenomenological perspective in the
last chapter. In this chapter we consider the topic from a more general
a
W
nalytical perspective.
The reason for doing this is so that we can develop a form of thinking which will
help us to understand what is going on in a quantitative, mathematical sense. We
will be introduced to concepts such as the Decay Constant and the Half Life as
well as units used for the measurement of radioactivity. You will also have a
chance to develop your understanding by being brought through three questions on
this subject.
live version
discussion
edit lesson
comment
report an error
ask a question
Assumptions
The usual starting point in most forms of analysis in physics is to make some assumptions which
simplify the situation. By simplifying the situation we can dispose of irrelevant effects which tend to
complicate matters but in doing so we sometimes make the situation so simple that it becomes a bit too
abstract and apparently hard to understand.
For this reason we will try here to relate the subject of radioactive decay to a more common
situation which we will use as an analogy and hopefully we will be able to overcome the abstract
feature of the subject matter. The analogy we will use here is that of making popcorn.
So think about putting some oil in a pot, adding the corn, heating the pot on the cooker and
watching what happens. You might also like to try this out while considering the situation!
For our radioactive decay situation we first of all consider that we have a sample containing a large
number of radioactive nuclei all of the same kind. This is our unpopped corn in the pot for example.
Secondly we assume that all of the radioactive nuclei decay by the same process be it alpha, beta
or gamma-decay. In other words our unpopped corn goes pop at some stage during the heating process.
Thirdly take a few moments to ponder on the fact that we can only really consider what is going on
from a statistical perspective. If you look at an individual piece of corn, can you figure out when it is
going to pop? Not really. You can however figure out that a large number of them will have popped
after a period of time. But its rather more difficult to figure out the situation for an individual piece of
corn. So instead of dealing with individual entities we consider what happens on a larger scale and this
is where statistics comes in. We can say that the radioactive decay is a statistical one-shot process, that
is when a nucleus has decayed it cannot repeat the process again. In other words when a piece of corn
has popped it cannot repeat the process. Simple!
In addition as long as a radioactive nucleus has not decayed the probability for it doing so in the
next moment remains the same. In other words if a piece of corn has not popped at a certain time the
20 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
The Radioactive Decay Law
chance of it popping in the next second is the same as in the previous second. The bets are even!
Let us not push this popcorn analogy too far though in that we know that we can control the rate of
popping by the heat we apply to the pot for example. However as far as our radioactive nuclei are
concerned there is nothing we can do to control what is going on. The rate at which nuclei go pop (or
decay, in other words) cannot be influenced by heating up the sample. Nor by cooling it for that matter
or by by putting it under greater pressures, by changing the gravitational environment by taking it out
into space for instance, or by changing any other aspect of its physical environment. The only thing that
determines whether an individual nucleus will decay seems to be the nucleus itself. But on the average
we can say that it will decay at some stage.
The Radioactive Decay Law
Let us now use some symbols to reduce the amount of writing we have to do to describe what is
going on and to avail ourselves of some mathematical techniques to simplify the situation even further
than we have been able to do so far.
Let us say that in the sample of radioactive material there are N nuclei which have not decayed at a
certain time, t. So what happens in the next brief period of time? Some nuclei will decay for sure. But
how many?
On the basis of our reasoning above we can say that the number which will decay will depend on
overall number of nuclei, N, and also on the length of the brief period of time. In other words the more
nuclei there are the more will decay and the longer the time period the more nuclei will decay. Let us
denote the number which will have decayed as dN and the small time interval as dt.
So we have reasoned that the number of radioactive nuclei which will decay during the time
interval from t to t+dt must be proportional to N and to dt. In symbols therefore:
the minus sign indicating that N is decreasing.
Turning the proportionality in this equation into an equality we can write:
where the constant of proportionality, λ, is called the Decay Constant.
Dividing across by N we can rewrite this equation as:
So this equation describes the situation for any brief time interval, dt. To find out what happens for
all periods of time we simply add up what happens in each brief time interval. In other words we
integrate the above equation. Expressing this more formally we can say that for the period of time from
t = 0 to any later time t, the number of radioactive nuclei will decrease from N0
 to Nt
, so that:
Wikibooks | 21
Chapter 3
This final expression is known as the Radioactive Decay Law. It tells us that the number of
radioactive nuclei will decrease in an exponential fashion with time with the rate of decrease being
controlled by the Decay Constant.
Before looking at this expression in further detail let us review the mathematics which we used
above. First of all we used integral calculus to figure out what was happening over a period of time by
integrating what we knew would occur in a brief interval of time. Secondly we used a calculus
relationship that the
where ln x represents the natural logarithm of x. And thirdly we used the definition of logarithms
that when
then,
Now, to return to the Radioactive Decay Law. The Law tells us that the number of radioactive
nuclei will decrease with time in an exponential fashion with the rate of decrease being controlled by
the Decay Constant. The Law is shown in graphical form in the figure below:
22 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
The Radioactive Decay Law
The graph plots the number of radioactive nuclei at any time, Nt
, against time, t. We can see that
the number of radioactive nuclei decreases from N0
that is the number at t = 0 in a rapid fashion
initially and then more slowly in the classic exponential manner.
The influence of the Decay Constant can be seen in the following figure:
All three curves here are exponential in nature, only the Decay Constant is different. Notice that
when the Decay Constant has a low value the curve decreases relatively slowly and when the Decay
Constant is large the curve decreases very quickly.
The Decay Constant is characteristic of individual radionuclides. Some like uranium-238 have a
small value and the material therefore decays quite slowly over a long period of time. Other nuclei such
as technetium-99m have a relatively large Decay Constant and they decay far more quickly.
Wikibooks | 23
Chapter 3
It is also possible to consider the Radioactive Decay Law from another perspective by plotting the
logarithm of Nt
 against time. In other words from our analysis above by plotting the expression:
in the form
Notice that this expression is simply an equation of the form y = mx + c where m = -l and c = ln
N0
. As a result it is the equation of a straight line of slope -l as shown in the following figure. Such a
plot is sometimes useful when we wish to consider a situation without the complication of the direct
exponential behaviour.
Half-Life
Most of us have not been taught to think instinctively in terms of logarithmic or exponential terms
even though many natural phenomena display exponential behaviours. Most of the forms of thinking
which we have been taught in school are based on linear changes and as a result it is rather difficult for
us to grasp the Radioactive Decay Law intuitively. For this reason an indicator is usually derived from
the law which helps us think more clearly about what is going on.
This indicator is called the Half Life and it expresses the length of time it takes for the
radioactivity of a radioisotope to decrease by a factor of two. From a graphical point of view we can
say that when:
the time taken is the Half Life:
24 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
The Radioactive Decay Law
Note that the half-life does not express how long a material will remain radioactive but simply the
length of time for its radioactivity to halve. Examples of the half lives of some radioisotopes are given
in the following table. Notice that some of these have a relatively short half life. These tend to be the
ones used for medical diagnostic purposes because they do not remain radioactive for very long
following administration to a patient and hence result in a relatively low radiation dose.
Radioisotope
Half Life
(approx.)
81mKr 13 seconds
99mTc 6 hours
131I 8 days
51Cr 1 month
137Cs 30 years
241Am 462 years
226Ra 1620 years
238U 4.51 x 109
 years
But they do present a logistical problem when we wish to use them when there may not be a
radioisotope production facility nearby. For example suppose we wish to use
99mTc for a patient study
and the nearest nuclear facility for making this isotope is 5,000 km away. The production facility could
Wikibooks | 25
Chapter 3
be in Sydney and the patient could be in Perth for instance. After making the isotope at the nuclear
plant it would be decaying with a half life of 6 hours. So we put the material on a truck and drive it to
Sydney airport. The isotope would be decaying as the truck sits in Sydney traffic then decaying still
more as it waits for a plane to take it to Perth. Then decaying more as it is flown across to Perth and so
on. By the time it gets to our patient it will have substantially reduced in radioactivity possibly to the
point of being useless for the patient's investigation. And what about the problem if we needed to use
81mKr instead of 99mTc for our patient? You will see in the last chapter of this wikibook that logistical
challenges such as this have given rise to quite innovative solutions. More about that later!
You can appreciate from the table above that other isotopes have a very long half lives. For
example
226Ra has a half life of over 1,500 years. This isotope has been used in the past for therapeutic
applications in medicine. Think about the logistical problems here. They obviously do not relate to
transporting the material from the point of production to the point of use. But they relate to how the
material is kept following its arrival at the point of use. We must have a storage facility so that the
material can be kept safely for a long period of time. But for how long? A general rule of thumb for the
quantities of radioactivity used in medicine is that the radioactivity will remain significant for about 10
half lives. So we would have to have a safe environment for storage of the 226Ra for about 16,000
years! This storage facility would have to be secure from many unforeseeable events such as
earthquakes, bombing etc and be kept in a manner which our children's, children's children can
understand. A very serious undertaking indeed!
Relationship between the Decay Constant and the Half
Life
On the basis of the above you should be able to appreciate that there is a relationship between the
Decay Constant and the Half Life. For example when the Decay Constant is small the Half Life should
be long and correspondingly when the Decay Constant is large the Half Life should be short. But what
exactly is the nature of this relationship?
We can easily answer this question by using the definition of Half Life and applying it to the
Radioactive Decay Law.
Once again the law tells us that at any time, t:
and the definition of Half Life tells us that:
when
We can therefore re-write the Radioactive Decay Law by substituting for Nt
 and t as follows:
Therefore
26 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
The Radioactive Decay Law
and
These last two equations express the relationship between the Decay Constant and the Half Life.
They are very useful as you will see when solving numerical questions relating to radioactivity and
usually form the first step in solving a numerical problem.
Units of Radioactivity
The SI or metric unit of radioactivity is named after Henri Becquerel, in honour of his discovery of
radioactivity, and is called the becquerel with the symbol Bq. The becquerel is defined as the quantity
of radioactive substance that gives rise to a decay rate of 1 decay per second.
In medical diagnostic work 1 Bq is a rather small amount of radioactivity. Indeed it is easy to
remember its definition if you think of it as a buggerall amount of radioactivity. For this reason the
kilobecquerel (kBq) and megabecquerel (MBq) are more frequently used.
The traditional unit of radioactivity is named after Marie Curie and is called the curie, with the
symbol Ci. The curie is defined as the amount of radioactive substance which gives rise to a decay rate
Wikibooks | 27
Chapter 3
of 3.7 x 1010 decays per second. In other words 37 thousand, million decays per second which as you
might appreciate is a substantial amount of radioactivity. For medical diagnostic work the millicurie
(mCi) and the microcurie (µCi) are therefore more frequently used.
Why two units? It in essence like all other units of measurement depends on what part of the world
you are in. For example the kilometer is widely used in Europe and Australia as a unit of distance and
the mile is used in the USA. So if you are reading an American textbook you are likely to find the curie
used as the unit of radioactivity, if you are reading an Australian book it will most likely refer to
becquerels and both units might be used if you are reading a European book. You will therefore find it
necessary to know and understand both units.
Questions
Three questions are given below to help you develop your understanding of the material presented
in this chapter. The first one is relatively straight-forward and will exercise your application of the
Radioactive Decay Law as well as your understanding of the concept of Half Life. The second question
is a lot more challenging and will help you relate the Radioactive Decay Law to the number of
radioactive nuclei which are decaying in a sample of radioactive material. The third question will help
you understand the approach used in the second question by asking a similar question from a slightly
different perspective.
Before you try the questions click HERE to access an interactive webpage which will do some
simple calculations for you.
Question 1
(a) The half-life of 99mTc is 6 hours. After how much time will 1/16th of the radioisotope remain?
(b) Verify your answer by another means.
Answer:
(a) Starting with the relationship we established earlier between the Decay Constant and the Half
Life we can calculate the Decay Constant as follows:
Now applying the Radioactive Decay Law,
we can re-write it in the form:
The question tells us that N0
 has reduced to 1/16th of its value, that is:
28 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
The Radioactive Decay Law
Therefore
which we need to solve for t. One way of doing this is as follows:
So it will take 24 hours until 1/16th of the radioactivity remains.
(b) A way in which this answer can be verified is by using the definition of Half Life. We are told
that the Half Life of 99mTc is 6 hours. Therefore after six hours half of the radioactivity remains.
Therefore after 12 hours a quarter remains; after 18 hours an eighth remains and after 24 hours one
sixteenth remains. And we arrive at the same answer as in part (a). So we must be right!
Note that this second approach is useful if we are dealing with relatively simple situations where
the radioactivity is halved, quartered and so on. But supposing the question asked how long would it
take for the radioactivity to decrease to a tenth of its initial value. Deduction from the definition of half
life is rather more difficult in this case and the mathematical approach used for part (a) above will yield
the answer more readily.
Question 2
Find the radioactivity of a 1 g sample of 226Ra given that t
1/2
: 1620 years and Avogadro's Number:
6.023 x 1023
.
Answer:
We can start the answer like we did with Question 1(a) by calculating the Decay Constant from the
Half Life using the following equation:
Wikibooks | 29
Chapter 3
Note that the length of a year used in converting from 'per year' to 'per second' above is 365.25
days to account for leap years. In addition the reason for converting to units of 'per second' is because
the unit of radioactivity is expressed as the number of nuclei decaying per second.
Secondly we can calculate that 1 g of 226Ra contains:
Thirdly we need to express the Radioactive Decay Law in terms of the number of nuclei decaying
per unit time. We can do this by differentiating the equation as follows:
The reason for expressing the result above in absolute terms is to remove the minus sign in that we
already know that the number is decreasing.
We can now enter the data we derived above for λ and N:
So the radioactivity of our 1 g sample of radium-226 is approximately 1 Ci.
This is not a surprising answer since the definition of the curie was originally conceived as the
radioactivity of 1 g of radium-226!
30 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
The Radioactive Decay Law
Question 3
What is the minimum mass of 99mTc that can have a radioactivity of 1 MBq? Assume the half-life
is 6 hours and that Avogadro's Number is 6.023 x 1023
.
Answer
Starting again with the relationship between the Decay Constant and the Half Life:
Secondly the question tells us that the radioactivity is 1 MBq. Therefore since 1 MBq = 1 x 106
decays per second,
Finally the mass of these nuclei can be calculated as follows:
In other words a mass of just over five picograms of 99mTc can emit one million gamma-rays per
second. The result reinforces an important point that you will learn about radiation protection which is
that you should treat radioactive materials just like you would handle pathogenic bacteria!
Multiple Choice Questions
Click HERE to access an online MCQ covering the material in this chapter.
congratulations on completing
CHAPTER 03 • THE RADIOACTIVE DECAY LAW
live version • discussion • edit lesson • comment • report an error • ask a question
Wikibooks | 31
Chapter 4
CHAPTER 4 UNITS OF RADIATION
MEASUREMENT
Introduction
fter that rather long and detailed chapter we have just finished we will now
proceed at a more leisurely pace for a short treatment of some of the more
common units of measurement used in this field.
A
Before we do so however it is useful to consider the typical radiation environment.
By doing so we will gain an appreciation of the various quantities that can be
measured before considering the units which are used to express such
measurements. So, we will first of all consider a typical radiation situation and
then go on to consider the various units of measurement.
live version
discussion
edit lesson
comment
report an error
ask a question
A Typical Radiation Situation
A typical radiation set-up is shown in the figure below. Firstly there is a source of radiation,
secondly a radiation beam and thirdly some material which absorbs the radiation. So the quantities
which can be measured are associated with the source, the radiation beam and the absorber.
This type of environment could be one where the radiation from the source is used to irradiate a
patient (that is the absorber) for diagnostic purposes where we would place a device behind the patient
for producing an image or for therapeutic purposes where the radiation is intended to cause damage to a
specific region of a patient. It is also a situation where we as an absorber may be working with a source
of radiation.
The Radiation Source
When the radiation source is a radioactive one the quantity that is typically measured is the
32 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Units of Radiation Measurement
radioactivity of the source. We saw in the previous chapter that the units used to express radioactivity
are the becquerel (SI unit) and the curie (traditional unit).
The Radiation Beam
The characteristic of a radiation beam that is typically measured is called the Radiation Exposure.
This quantity expresses how much ionisation the beam causes in the air through which it travels.
We will see in the following chapter that one of the major things that happens when radiation
encounters matter is that ions are formed - air being the form of matter it encounters in this case. So the
radiation exposure produced by a radiation beam is expressed in terms of the amount of ionisation
which occurs in air.
A straight-forward way of measuring such ionisation is to determine the amount of electric charge
which is produced. You will remember from your high school physics that the SI unit of electric charge
is the coulomb.
The SI unit of radiation exposure is the coulomb per kilogram - and is given the symbol C kg-1
. It
is defined as the quantity of X- or gamma-rays such that the associated electrons emitted per kilogram
of air at standard temperature and pressure (STP) produce ions carrying 1 coulomb of electric charge.
The traditional unit of radiation exposure is the roentgen, named in honour of Wilhelm Roentgen
(who discovered X-rays) and is given the symbol R. The roentgen is defined as the quantity of X- or
gamma-rays such that the associated electrons emitted per kilogram of air at STP produce ions carrying
2.58 x 10-4 coulombs of electric charge.
So 1 R is a small exposure relative to 1 C kg-1 - in fact it is 3,876 times smaller.
Note that this unit is confined to radiation beams consisting of X-rays or gamma-rays.
Often it is not simply the exposure that is of interest but the exposure rate, that is the exposure per
unit time. The units which tend to be used in this case are the C kg-1 s-1 and the R hr-1
.
The Absorber
Energy is deposited in the absorber when radiation interacts with it. It is usually quite a small
amount of energy but energy nonetheless. The quantity that is measured is called the Absorbed Dose
and it is of relevance to all types of radiation be they X- or gamma-rays, alpha- or beta-particles.
The SI unit of absorbed dose is called the gray, named after a famous radiobiologist, LH Gray, and
is given the symbol Gy. The gray is defined as the absorption of 1 joule of radiation energy per
kilogram of material. So when 1 joule of radiation energy is absorbed by a kilogram of the absorber
material we say that the absorbed dose is 1 Gy.
The traditional unit of absorbed dose is called the rad, which supposedly stands for Radiation
Absorbed Dose. It is defined as the absorption of 10-2 joules of radiation energy per kilogram of
Wikibooks | 33
Chapter 4
material.
As you can figure out 1 Gy is equal to 100 rad.
There are other quantities derived from the gray and the rad which express the biological effects of
such absorbed radiation energy when the absorber is living matter - human tissue for example. These
quantities include the Equivalent Dose and the Effective Dose.
Let us pause here for a bit to ponder on the use of the term dose. It usually has a medical
connotation in that we can say that someone had a dose of the 'flu, or that the doctor prescribed a
certain dose of a drug. What has it to do with the deposition of energy by a beam of radiation in an
absorber? It could have something to do with the initial applications of radiation in the early part of the
20th
century when it was used to treat numerous diseases. As a result we can speculate that the term has
stayed in the vernacular of the field. It would be much easier to use a term like absorbed radiation
energy since we are talking about the deposition of energy in an absorber. But this might make the
subject just a little too simple!
Specific Gamma Ray Constant
A final quantity is worth mentioning with regard to radiation units. This is the Specific GammaRay Constant for a radioisotope. This quantity is an amalgam of the quantities we have already covered
and expresses the exposure rate produced by the gamma-rays emitted from a radioisotope.
It is quite a useful quantity from a practical viewpoint when we are dealing with a radioactive
source which emits gamma-rays. Supposing you are using a gamma-emitting radioactive source (for
example
99mTc or 137Cs) and you will be standing at a certain distance from this source while you are
working. You most likely will be interested in the exposure rate produced by the source from a
radiation safety point of view. This is where the Specific Gamma-Ray Constant comes in.
It is defined as the exposure rate per unit activity at a certain distance from a source. The SI unit is
therefore the
C kg-1 s-1 Bq-1 at 1 m ,
and the traditional unit is the
R hr-1 mCi-1 at 1 cm .
These units of measurement are quite cumbersome and a bit of a mouthful. It might have been
better if they were named after some famous scientist so that we could call the SI unit 1 smith and the
traditional unit 1 jones for example. But again things are not that simple!
The Inverse Square Law
Before we finish this chapter we are going to consider what happens as we move our absorber
away from the radiation source. In other words we are going to think about the influence of distance on
34 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Units of Radiation Measurement
the intensity of the radiation beam. You will find that a useful result emerges from this that has a very
important impact on radiation safety.
The radiation produced in a radioactive source is emitted in all directions. We can consider that
spheres of equal radiation intensity exist around the source with the number of photons/particles
spreading out as we move away from the source.
Consider an area on the surface of one of these spheres and assume that there are a certain number
of photons/particles passing though it. If we now consider a sphere at a greater distance from the source
the same number of photons/particles will now be spread out over a bigger area. Following this line of
thought it is easy to appreciate that the radiation intensity will decrease with the square of the distance
from the source.
This effect is known as the Inverse Square Law. As a result if we double the distance from a
source, we reduce the intensity by a factor of two squared, that is 4. If we treble the distance the
intensity is reduced by a factor of 9, that is three squared, and so on.
This is a very useful piece of information if you are working with a source of radiation and are
interested in minimising the dose of radiation you will receive.
External Links
• Radiation and Risk - covers the effect of radiation, how risks are determined, comparison
of radiation with other risks and radiation doses.
• Radiation Effects Overview - results of studies of victims of nuclear bombs including early
effects on survivors, effects on the in utero exposed, and late effects on the survivors - from the
Radiation Effects Research Foundation, a cooperative Japan-United States Research
Organization.
• The Radiation and Health Physics Home Page - all you ever wanted to know about
radiation but were afraid to ask....with hundreds of WWW links - from the Student Chapter of
the Health Physics Society, University of Michigan containing sections on general information,
regulatory Information, professional organizations and societies, radiation specialties, health
physics research and education.
• What You Need to Know about Radiation - to protect yourself to protect your family to
make reasonable social and political choices - covers sources of radiation and radiation
protection - by Lauriston S. Taylor.
Multiple Choice Questions
Click HERE to access an online MCQ covering the material in this chapter.
congratulations on completing
CHAPTER 04 • UNITS OF RADIATION MEASUREMENT
Wikibooks | 35
Chapter 4
live version • discussion • edit lesson • comment • report an error • ask a question
36 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Interaction of Radiation with Matter
CHAPTER 5 INTERACTION OF RADIATION WITH
MATTER
Introduction
e have focussed in previous chapters on the source of radiation and the
types of radiation. We are now in a position to consider what happens when
this radiation interacts with matter. Our main reason for doing this is to find out
what happens to the radiation as it passes through matter and also to set ourselves
up for considering how to detect radiation. Since all radiation detectors are made
from some form of matter it is useful to first of all know how radiation interacts so
that we can exploit the effects in the design of such detectors.
W
live version
discussion
edit lesson
comment
report an error
ask a question
Before we do this let us first remind ourselves of the physical characteristics of the major types of
radiation. We have covered this material in some detail in the first chapter and it are summarised below
for convenience:
Radiation Mass Electric Charge Velocity
Alpha Particles relatively heavy double positive relatively slow
Beta Particles
about 8,000 times
lighter
negative
less than the velocity of
light
Gamma Rays None None 3 x 108
 m/s in free space
We will now consider the passage of each type of radiation through matter with most attention
given to gamma-rays because they are the most common type used in nuclear medicine. One of the
main effects that you will notice irrespective of the type of radiation is that ions are produced when
radiation interacts with matter. It is for this reason that it is called ionizing radiation.
Before we start though you might find an analogy useful to help you with your thinking. This
analogy works on the basis of thinking about matter as an enormous mass of atoms (that is nuclei with
orbiting electrons) and that the radiation is a particle/photon passing through this type of environment.
So the analogy to think about is a spaceship passing through a meteor storm like you might see in a
science-fiction movie where the spaceship represents the radiation and the meteors represent the atoms
of the material through which the radiation is passing. One added feature to bring on board however is
that our spaceship sometimes has an electric charge depending on the type of radiation.
Alpha Particles
We can see from the table above that alpha-particles have a double positive charge and we can
therefore easily appreciate that they will exert considerable electrostatic attraction on the outer orbital
electrons of atoms near which they pass. The result is that some electrons will be attracted away from
Wikibooks | 37
Chapter 5
their parent atoms and that ions will be produced. In other words ionizations occur.
We can also appreciate from the table that alpha-particles are quite massive relative to the other
types of radiation and also to the electrons of atoms of the material through which they are passing. As
a result they travel in straight lines through matter except for rare direct collisions with nuclei of atoms
along their path.
A third feature of relevance here is the energy with which they are emitted. This energy in the case
of alpha-particles is always distinct. For example
221Ra emits an alpha-particle with an energy of 6.71
MeV. Every alpha-particle emitted from this radionuclide has this energy. Another example is
230U
which emits three alpha-particles with energies of 5.66, 5.82, 5.89 MeV.
Finally it is useful to note that alpha-particles are very damaging biologically and this is one reason
why they are not used for in-vivo diagnostic studies. We will therefore not be considering them in any
great detail in this wikibook.
Beta Particles
We can see from the table that beta-particles have a negative electric charge. Notice that positrons
are not considered here since as we noted in chapter 2 these particles do not last for very long in matter
before they are annihilated. Beta-minus particles last considerably longer and are therefore the focus of
our attention here.
Because of their negative charge they are attracted by nuclei and repelled by electron clouds as
they pass through matter. The result once again without going into great detail is ionization.
The path of beta-particles in matter is often described as being tortuous, since they tend to ricochet
from atom to atom.
A final and important point to note is that the energy of beta-particles is never found to be distinct
in contrast to the alpha-particles above. The energies of the beta-particles from a radioactive source
forms a spectrum up to a maximum energy - see figure below. Notice from the figure that a range of
energies is present and features such as the mean energy, Emean
, or the maximum energy, Emax
, are
quoted.
38 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Interaction of Radiation with Matter
The question we will consider here is: why should a spectrum of energies be seen? Surely if a betaparticle is produced inside a nucleus when a neutron is converted into a proton, a single distinct energy
should result. The answer lies in the fact that two particles are actually produced in beta-decay. We did
not cover this in our treatment in chapter 2 for fear of complicating things too much at that stage of this
wikibook. But we will cover it here briefly for the sake of completeness.
The second particle produced in beta-decay is called a neutrino and was named by Enrico Fermi. It
is quite a mysterious particle possessing neither mass nor charge and we are still researching its
properties today. The difficulty with them is that they are very hard to detect and this has greatly
limited our knowledge about them so far.
The beta-particle energy spectrum can be explained by considering that the energy produced when
a neutron is converted to a proton is shared between the beta-particle and the neutrino. Sometimes all
the energy is given to the beta-particle and it receives the maximum energy, Emax
. But more often the
energy is shared between them so that for example the beta-particle has the mean energy, Emean
and the
neutrino has the remainder of the energy.
Finally it is useful to note that beta-particles are quite damaging biologically and this is one reason
why they are not used for in-vivo diagnostic studies. We will therefore not consider them in any great
detail in this wikibook.
Gamma Rays
Since we have been talking about energies above let us first note that the energies of gamma-rays
emitted from a radioactive source are always distinct. For example
99mTc emits gamma-rays which all
have an energy of 140 keV and 51Cr emits gamma-rays which have an energy of 320 keV.
Gamma-rays have many modes of interaction with matter. Some of those which are not important
to nuclear medicine imaging are:
• Mössbauer Effect
• Coherent Scattering
• Pair Production
Wikibooks | 39
Chapter 5
and will not be described here.
Those which are very important to nuclear medicine imaging, are the Photoelectric Effect and the
Compton Effect. We will consider each of these in turn below. Note that the effects described here are
also of relevance to the interaction of X-rays with matter since as we have noted before X-rays and
gamma-rays are essentially the same entities. So the treatment below is also of relevance to
radiography.
Photoelectric Effect
When a gamma-ray collides with an orbital electron of an atom of the material through which it is
passing it can transfer all its energy to the electron and cease to exist - see figure below. On the basis of
the Principle of Conservation of Energy we can deduce that the electron will leave the atom with a
kinetic energy equal to the energy of the gamma-ray less that of the orbital binding energy. This
electron is called a photoelectron.
Note that an ion results when the photoelectron leaves the atom. Also note that the gamma-ray
energy is totally absorbed in the process.
Two subsequent points should also be noted. Firstly the photoelectron can cause ionisations along
its track in a similar manner to a beta-particle. Secondly X-ray emission can occur when the vacancy
left by the photoelectron is filled by an electron from an outer shell of the atom. Remember that we
came across this type of feature before when we dealt with Electron Capture in Chapter 2.
Compton Effect
This type of effect is somewhat akin to a cue ball hitting a coloured ball on a pool table. Here a
gamma-ray transfers only part of its energy to a valance electron which is essentially free - see figure
below. Notice that the electron leaves the atom and may act like a beta-particle and that the gamma-ray
deflects off in a different direction to that with which it approached the atom. This deflected or
40 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Click HERE for an animated version of this graphic.
Interaction of Radiation with Matter
scattered gamma-ray can undergo further Compton Effects within the material.
Note that this effect is sometimes called Compton Scattering.
Attenuation
The two effects we have just described give rise to both absorption and scattering of the radiation
beam. The overall effect is referred to as attenuation of gamma-rays. We will investigate this feature
from an analytical perspective in the following chapter.
Multiple Choice Questions
Click HERE to access an online MCQ covering the material in this chapter.
congratulations on completing
CHAPTER 05 • INTERACTION OF RADIATION WITH MATTER
live version • discussion • edit lesson • comment • report an error • ask a question
Wikibooks | 41
Click HERE for an animated version of this graphic.
Chapter 6
CHAPTER 6 ATTENUATION OF GAMMA-RAYS
Introduction
e covered the interaction of gamma-rays with matter from a descriptive
viewpoint in the previous chapter and we saw that the Compton and
Photoelectric Effects were the major mechanisms. We will consider the subject
again here but this time from an analytical perspective. This will allow us to
develop a more general understanding of the phenomenon.
W
Note that the treatment here also refers to the attenuation of X-rays since, as we
noted before gamma-rays and X-rays are essentially the same physical entities.
live version
discussion
edit lesson
comment
report an error
ask a question
Our treatment begins with a description of a simple radiation experiment which can be performed
easily in the laboratory and which many of the early pioneers in this field did. We will then build on the
information obtained from such an experiment to develop a simple equation and some simple concepts
which will allow us generalise the situation to any attenuation situation.
Attenuation Experiment
The experiment is quite simple. It involves firing a narrow beam of gamma-rays at a material and
measuring how much of the radiation gets through. We can vary the energy of the gamma-rays we use
and the type of absorbing material as well as its thickness and density.
The experimental set-up is illustrated in the figure below. We refer to the intensity of the radiation
which strikes the absorber as the incident intensity, I
0
, and the intensity of the radiation which gets
through the absorber as the transmitted intensity, IX
. Notice also that the thickness of the absorber is
denoted by x.
From what we covered in the previous chapter we can appreciate that some of the gamma-rays will
be subjected to interactions such as the Photoelectric Effect and the Compton Effect as they pass
through the absorber. The transmitted gamma-rays will in the main be those which pass through
42 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Attenuation of Gamma-Rays
without any interactions at all.
We can therefore expect to find that the transmitted intensity will be less than the incident
intensity, that is
But by how much you might ask. Before we consider this let us denote the difference between IX
and I0
 as ∆I, that is
Effect of Atomic Number
Let us start exploring the magnitude of ∆I by placing different absorbers in turn in the radiation
beam. What we would find is that the magnitude of ∆I is highly dependent on the atomic number of the
absorbing material. For example we would find that ∆I would be quite low in the case of an absorber
made from carbon (Z=6) and very large in the case of lead (Z=82).
We can gain an appreciation of why this is so from the following figure:
The figure illustrates a high atomic number absorber by the large circles which represent
individual atoms and a low atomic number material by smaller circles. The incident radiation beam is
represented by the arrows entering each absorber from the left. Notice that the atoms of the high atomic
number absorber present larger targets for the radiation to strike and hence the chances for interactions
via the Photoelectric and Compton Effects is relatively high. The attenuation should therefore be
relatively large.
Wikibooks | 43
Chapter 6
In the case of the low atomic number absorber however the individual atoms are smaller and hence
the chances of interactions are reduced. In other words the radiation has a greater probability of being
transmitted through the absorber and the attenuation is consequently lower than in the high atomic
number case.
With respect to our spaceship analogy used in the previous chapter the atomic number can be
thought of as the size of individual meteors in the meteor cloud.
If we were to precisely control our experimental set-up and carefully analyse our results we would
find that:
Therefore if we were to double the atomic number of our absorber we would increase the
attenuation by a factor of two cubed, that is 8, if we were to triple the atomic number we would
increase the attenuation by a factor of 27, that is three cubed, and so on.
It is for this reason that high atomic number materials (e.g. Pb) are used for radiation protection.
Effect of Density
A second approach to exploring the magnitude of ∆I is to see what happens when we change the
density of the absorber. We can see from the following figure that a low density absorber will give rise
to less attenuation than a high density absorber since the chances of an interaction between the
radiation and the atoms of the absorber are relatively lower.
So in our analogy of the spaceship entering a meteor cloud think of meteor clouds of different
density and the chances of the spaceship colliding with a meteor.
44 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Attenuation of Gamma-Rays
Effect of Thickness
A third factor which we could vary is the thickness of the absorber. As you should be able to
predict at this stage the thicker the absorber the greater the attenuation.
Effect of Gamma-Ray Energy
Finally in our experiment we could vary the energy of the gamma-ray beam. We would find
without going into it in any great detail that the greater the energy of the gamma-rays the less the
attenuation. You might like to think of it in terms of the energy with which the spaceship approaches
the meteor cloud and the likelihood of a slow spaceship getting through as opposed to a spaceship
travelling with a higher energy.
Mathematical Model
We will consider a mathematical here which will help us to express our experimental observations
in more general terms. You will find that the mathematical approach adopted and the result obtained is
quite similar to what we encountered earlier with Radioactive Decay. So you will not have to plod your
way through any new maths below, just a different application of the same form of mathematical
analysis!
Let us start quite simply and assume that we vary only the thickness of the absorber. In other
words we use an absorber of the same material (i.e. same atomic number) and the same density and use
gamma-rays of the same energy for the experiment. Only the thickness of the absorber is changed.
From our reasoning above it is easy to appreciate that the magnitude of ∆I should be dependent on
the radiation intensity as well as the thickness of the absorber, that is for an infinitesimally small
change in absorber thickness:
the minus sign indicating that the intensity is reduced by the absorber.
Turning the proportionality in this equation into an equality, we can write:
where the constant of proportionality, μ, is called the Linear Attenuation Coefficient.
Dividing across by I we can rewrite this equation as:
So this equation describes the situation for any tiny change in absorber thickness, dx. To find out
what happens for the complete thickness of an absorber we simply add up what happens in each small
Wikibooks | 45
Chapter 6
thickness. In other words we integrate the above equation. Expressing this more formally we can say
that for thicknesses from x = 0 to any other thickness x, the radiation intensity will decrease from I
0
to
IX
, so that:
This final expression tells us that the radiation intensity will decrease in an exponential fashion
with the thickness of the absorber with the rate of decrease being controlled by the Linear Attenuation
Coefficient. The expression is shown in graphical form below. The graph plots the intensity against
thickness, x. We can see that the intensity decreases from I
0
, that is the number at x = 0, in a rapid
fashion initially and then more slowly in the classic exponential manner.
Table 1: Graphical representation of the dependence of radiation intensity on the thickness of absorber: Intensity versus
thickness on the left and the natural logarithm of the intensity versus thickness on the right.
The influence of the Linear Attenuation Coefficient can be seen in the next figure. All three curves
here are exponential in nature, only the Linear Attenuation Coefficient is different. Notice that when
the Linear Attenuation Coefficient has a low value the curve decreases relatively slowly and when the
46 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Attenuation of Gamma-Rays
Linear Attenuation Coefficient is large the curve decreases very quickly.
The Linear Attenuation Coefficient is characteristic of individual absorbing materials. Some like
carbon have a small value and are easily penetrated by gamma-rays. Other materials such as lead have
a relatively large Linear Attenuation Coefficient and are relatively good absorbers of radiation:
Absorber 100 keV 200 keV 500 keV
Air 0.000195 0.000159 0.000112
Water 0.167 0.136 0.097
Carbon 0.335 0.274 0.196
Aluminiu
m
0.435 0.324 0.227
Iron 2.72 1.09 0.655
Copper 3.8 1.309 0.73
Lead 59.7 10.15 1.64
Table 2: Linear Attenuation Coefficients (in cm-1) for a range of materials at gamma-ray energies of 100, 200 and 500
keV.
Wikibooks | 47
Illustration 1: Exponential attenuation expressed using a small,
medium and large value of the Linear Attenuation Coefficient, µ.
Chapter 6
The materials listed in the table above are air, water and a range of elements from carbon (Z=6)
through to lead (Z=82) and their Linear Attenuation Coefficients are given for three gamma-ray
energies. The first point to note is that the Linear Attenuation Coefficient increases as the atomic
number of the absorber increases. For example it increases from a very small value of 0.000195 cm-1
for air at 100 keV to almost 60 cm-1 for lead. The second point to note is that the Linear Attenuation
Coefficient for all materials decreases with the energy of the gamma-rays. For example the value for
copper decreases from about 3.8 cm-1 at 100 keV to 0.73 cm-1 at 500 keV. The third point to note is
that the trends in the table are consistent with the analysis presented earlier. Finally it is important to
appreciate that our analysis above is only strictly true when we are dealing with narrow radiation
beams. Other factors need to be taken into account when broad radiation beams are involved.
Half Value Layer
As with using the Half Life to describe the Radioactive Decay Law an indicator is usually derived
from the exponential attenuation equation above which helps us think more clearly about what is going
on. This indicator is called the Half Value Layer and it expresses the thickness of absorbing material
which is needed to reduce the incident radiation intensity by a factor of two. From a graphical point of
view we can say that when:
the thickness of absorber is the Half Value Layer:
The Half Value Layer for a range of absorbers is listed in the following table for three gamma-ray
energies:
Absorber 100 keV 200 keV 500 keV
Air 3,555 4,359 6,189
Water 4.15 5.1 7.15
Carbon 2.07 2.53 3.54
48 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Attenuation of Gamma-Rays
Aluminiu
m
1.59 2.14 3.05
Iron 0.26 0.64 1.06
Copper 0.18 0.53 0.95
Lead 0.012 0.068 0.42
Half Value Layers (in cm) for a range of materials at gamma-ray energies of 100, 200 and 500
keV.
The first point to note is that the Half Value Layer decreases as the atomic number increases. For
example the value for air at 100 keV is about 35 meters and it decreases to just 0.12 mm for lead at this
energy. In other words 35 m of air is needed to reduce the intensity of a 100 keV gamma-ray beam by a
factor of two whereas just 0.12 mm of lead can do the same thing. The second thing to note is that the
Half Value Layer increases with increasing gamma-ray energy. For example from 0.18 cm for copper
at 100 keV to about 1 cm at 500 keV. Thirdly note that relative to the data in the previous table there is
a reciprocal relationship between the Half Value Layer and the Linear Attenuation Coefficient, which
we will now investigate.
Relationship between the Linear Attenuation Coefficient
and the Half Value Layer
As was the case with the Radioactive Decay Law, where we explored the relationship between the
Half Life and the Decay Constant, a relationship can be derived between the Half Value Layer and the
Linear Attenuation Coefficient. We can do this by using the definition of the Half Value Layer:
when
and inserting it in the exponential attenuation equation, that is:
to give
Therefore
Wikibooks | 49
Chapter 6
and
These last two equations express the relationship between the Linear Attenuation Coefficient and
the Half Value Layer. They are very useful as you will see when solving numerical questions relating
to attenuation and frequently form the first step in solving a numerical problem.
Mass Attenuation Coefficient
We implied above that the Linear Attenuation Coefficient was useful when we were considering
an absorbing material of the same density but of different thicknesses. A related coefficient can be of
value when we wish to include the density, ρ, of the absorber in our analysis. This is the Mass
Attenuation Coefficient which is defined as the:
The measurement unit used for the Linear Attenuation Coefficient in the table above is cm-1
, and a
50 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Attenuation of Gamma-Rays
common unit of density is the g cm-3
. You might like to derive for yourself on this basis that the cm2 g
-
1
 is the equivalent unit of the Mass Attenuation Coefficient.
Questions
Two questions are given below to help you develop your understanding of the material presented
in this chapter. The first one is relatively straight-forward and will exercise your application of the
exponential attenuation equation. The second question is a lot more challenging and will help you
relate exponential attenuation to radioactivity and radiation exposure.
Question 1
How much aluminium is required to reduce the intensity of a 200 keV gamma-ray beam to 10% of
its incident intensity? Assume that the Half Value Layer for 200 keV gamma-rays in Al is 2.14 cm.
Answer
The question phrased in terms of the symbols used above is:
, when x = ?
We are told that the Half Value Layer is 2.14 cm. Therefore the Linear Attenuation Coefficient is
Now combining all this with the exponential attenuation equation:
we can write:
Therefore
Wikibooks | 51
Chapter 6
So the thickness of aluminium required to reduce these gamma-rays by a factor of ten is about 7
cm. This relatively large thickness is the reason why aluminium is not generally used in radiation
protection - its atomic number is not high enough for efficient and significant attenuation of gammarays.
You might like to try this question for the case when Pb is the absorber - but you will need to find
out the Half Value Layer for the 200 keV gamma-rays yourself!
Here's a hint though: have a look at one of the tables above.
And here's the answer for you to check when you've finished: 2.2 mm.
In other words a relatively thin thickness of Pb is required to do the same job as 7 cm of
aluminium.
Question 2
A 105 MBq source of 137Cs is to be contained in a Pb box so that the exposure rate 1 m away from
the source is less than 0.5 mR/hour. If the Half Value Layer for 137Cs gamma-rays in Pb is 0.6 cm,
what thickness of Pb is required? The Specific Gamma Ray Constant for 137Cs is 3.3 R hr-1 mCi-1 at 1
cm.
Answer
This is a fairly typical question which arises when someone is using radioactive materials. We
wish to use a certain quantity of the material and we wish to store it in a lead container so that the
exposure rate when we are working a certain distance away is below some level for safety reasons. We
know the radioactivity of the material we will be using. But its quoted in SI units. We look up a
reference book to find out the exposure rate for this radioisotope and find that the Specific Gamma Ray
Constant is quoted in traditional units. Just as in our question!
So let us start by getting our units right. The Specific Gamma Ray Constant is given as:
3.3 R hr-1 mCi-1 at 1 cm from the source.
52 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Attenuation of Gamma-Rays
This is equal to:
3300 mR hr-1 mCi-1 at 1 cm from the source,
which is equal to:
mR hr-1 mCi-1 at 1 m from the source,
on the basis of the Inverse Square Law. This result expressed per becquerel is
mR hr-1 Bq-1 at 1 m from the source,
since 1 mCi = 3.7 x 107
 Bq. And therefore for 105
 MBq, the exposure rate is:
mR hr-1 (105MBq)-1 at 1 m from the source,
That is the exposure rate 1 meter from our source is 891.9 mR hr
-1
.
We wish to reduce this exposure rate according to the question to less than 0.5 mR hr-1 using Pb.
You should be able at this stage to use the exponential attenuation equation along with the Half
Value Layer for these gamma-rays in Pb to calculate that the thickness of Pb required is about 6.5 cm.
External Links
• Mucal on the Web - an online program which calculates x-ray absorption coefficients - by
Pathikrit Bandyopadhyay, The Center for Synchrotron Radiation Research and Instrumentation
at the Illinois Institute of Technology.
• Tables of X-Ray Mass Attenuation Coefficients - a vast amount of data for all elements
from National Institute of Science & Technology, USA.
Multiple Choice Questions
Click HERE to access an online MCQ covering the material in this chapter.
Wikibooks | 53
Chapter 6
congratulations on completing
CHAPTER 06 • ATTENUATION OF GAMMA-RAYS
live version • discussion • edit lesson • comment • report an error • ask a question
54 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Gas-Filled Radiation Detectors
CHAPTER 7 GAS-FILLED RADIATION
DETECTORS
Introduction
e have learnt in the last two chapters about how radiation interacts with
matter and we are now in a position to apply our understanding to the
de
W
tection of radiation.
One of the major outcomes of the interaction of radiation with matter is the
creation of ions as we saw in Chapter 5. This outcome is exploited in gas-filled
detectors as you will see in this chapter. The detector in this case is essentially a
gas, in that it is the atoms of a gas which are ionised by the radiation. We will see
in the next chapter that solids can also be used as radiation detectors but for now
we will deal with gases and be introduced to detectors such as the Ionization
Chamber and the Geiger Counter.
live version
discussion
edit lesson
comment
report an error
ask a question
Before considering these specific types of gas-filled detectors we will first of all consider the
situation from a very general perspective.
Gas-Filled Detectors
As we noted above the radiation interacts with gas atoms in this form of detector and causes ions
to be produced. On the basis of what we covered in Chapter 5 it is easy to appreciate that it is the
Photoelectric and Compton Effects that cause the ionisations when the radiation consists of gammarays with energies useful for diagnostic purposes.
There are actually two particles generated when an ion is produced - the positive ion itself and an
electron. These two particles are collectively called an ion pair. The detection of the production of ion
pairs in the gas is the basis upon which gas detectors operate. The manner in which this is done is by
using an electric field to sweep the electrons away to a positively charged electrode and the ions to a
negatively charged electrode.
Let us consider a very simple arrangement as shown in the following figure:
Wikibooks | 55
Chapter 7
Here we have two electrodes with the gas between them. Something like a capacitor with a gas
dielectric.
The gas which is used is typically an inert gas, for example argon or xenon. The reason for using
an inert gas is so that chemical reactions will not occur within the gas following the ionisations which
could change the characteristics of our detector.
A dc voltage is placed between the two electrodes. As a result when the radiation interacts with a
gas atom the electron will move towards the positive electrode and the ion will move towards the
negative electrode. But will these charges reach their respective electrodes? The answer is obviously
dependent on the magnitude of the dc voltage. For example if at one extreme we had a dc voltage of a
microvolt (that is, one millionth of a volt) the resultant electric field may be insufficient to move the
ion pair very far and the two particles may recombine to reform the gas atom. At the other extreme
suppose we applied a million volts between the two electrodes. In this case we are likely to get sparks
flying between the two electrodes - a lightning bolt if you like - and our detector might act something
like a neon sign. Somewhere in between these two extremes though we should be able to provide a
sufficient attractive force for the ion and electron to move to their respective electrodes without
recombination or sparking occurring.
We will look at this subject in more detail below. Before we do let us see how the concept of the
simple detector illustrated above is applied in practice. The gas-filled chamber is generally cylindrical
in shape in real detectors. This shape has been found to be more efficient than the parallel electrode
arrangement shown above.
A cross-sectional view through this cylinder is shown in the following figure:
56 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Gas-Filled Radiation Detectors
The positive electrode consists of a thin wire running through the centre of the cylinder and the
negative electrode consists of the wall of the cylinder. In principle we could make such a detector by
getting a section of a metal pipe, mounting a wire through its centre, filling it with an inert gas and
sealing the ends of the pipe. Actual detectors are a little bit more complex however but let us not get
side-tracked at this stage.
We apply a dc voltage via a battery or via a dc voltage supply and connect it as shown in the figure
using a resistor, R. Now, assume that a gamma-ray enters the detector. Ion pairs will be produced in the
gas - the ions heading towards the outer wall and the electrons heading towards the centre wire. Let us
think about the electrons for a moment. When they hit the centre wire we can simply think of them as
entering the wire and flowing through the resistor to get to the positive terminal of the dc voltage
supply. These electrons flowing through the resistor constitute an electric current and as a result of
Ohm's Law a voltage is generated across the resistor. This voltage is amplified by an amplifier and
some type of device is used to register the amplified voltage. A loud-speaker is a fairly simple device to
use for this purpose and the generation of a voltage pulse is manifest by a click from the loud-speaker.
Other display devices include a ratemeter which displays the number of voltage pulses generated per
unit time - something like a speedometer in a car - and a pulse counter (or scaler) which counts the
number of voltage pulses generated in a set period of time. A voltage pulse is frequently referred to in
practice as a count and the number of voltage pulses generated per unit time is frequently called the
count rate.
DC Voltage Dependence
If we were to build a detector and electronic circuit as shown in the figure above we could conduct
an experiment that would allow us to explore the effect of the dc voltage on the magnitude of the
voltage pulses produced across the resistor, R. Note that the term pulse height is frequently used in this
field to refer to the magnitude of voltage pulses.
Ideally, we could generate a result similar to that illustrated in the following figure:
Wikibooks | 57
Chapter 7
The graph illustrates the dependence of the pulse height on the dc voltage. Note that the vertical
axis representing the pulse height is on a logarithmic scale for the sake of compressing a large linear
scale onto a reasonably-sized graph.
The experimental results can be divided into five regions as shown. We will now consider each
region in turn.
• Region A Here Vdc is relatively low so that recombination of positive ions and electrons
occurs. As a result not all ion pairs are collected and the voltage pulse height is relatively low. It
does increase as the dc voltage increases however as the amount of recombination reduces.
• Region B Vdc is sufficiently high in this region so that only a negligible amount of
recombination occurs. This is the region where a type of detector called the Ionization
Chamber operates.
• Region C Vdc is sufficiently high in this region so that electrons approaching the centre
wire attain sufficient energy between collisions with the electrons of gas atoms to produce new
ion pairs. Thus the number of electrons is increased so that the electric charge passing through
the resistor, R, may be up to a thousand times greater than the charge produced initially by the
radiation interaction. This is the region where a type of detector called the Proportional Counter
operates.
• Region D Vdc is so high that even a minimally-ionizing particle will produce a very
large voltage pulse. The initial ionization produced by the radiation triggers a complete gas
breakdown as an avalanche of electrons heads towards and spreads along the centre wire. This
region is called the Geiger-Müller Region, and is exploited in the Geiger Counter.
• Region F Here Vdc is high enough for the gas to completely breakdown and it cannot be
used to detect radiation.
We will now consider features of the Ionisation Chamber and the Geiger Counter in more detail.
Ionisation Chamber
The ionisation chamber consists of a gas-filled detector energised by a relatively low dc voltage.
We will first of all make an estimate of the voltage pulse height generated by this type of detector. We
58 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Gas-Filled Radiation Detectors
will then consider some applications of ionisation chambers.
When a beta-particle interacts with the gas the energy required to produce one ion pair is about 30
eV. Therefore when a beta-particle of energy 1 MeV is completely absorbed in the gas the number of
ion pairs produced is:
The electric charge produced in the gas is therefore
If the capacitance of the ionisation chamber (remember that we compared a gas-filled detector to a
capacitor above) is 100 pF then the amplitude of the voltage pulse generated is:
Because such a small voltage is generated it is necessary to use a very sensitive amplifier in the
electronic circuitry connected to the chamber.
We will now learn about two applications of ionisation chambers. The first one is for the
measurement of radiation exposures. You will remember from Chapter 4 that the unit of radiation
exposure (be it the SI or the traditional unit) is defined in terms of the amount of electric charge
produced in a unit mass of a air. An ionization chamber filled with air is the natural instrument to use
for such measurements.
The second application is the measurement of radioactivity. The ionisation chamber used here is
configured in what is called a re-entrant arrangement (see figure below) so that the sample of
radioactive material can be placed within the detector using a holder and hence most of the emitted
radiation can be detected. The instrument is widely referred to as an Isotope Calibrator and the trickle
of electric current generated by such a detector is calibrated so that a reading in units of radioactivity
(for example MBq or mCi) can be obtained. Most well-run Nuclear Medicine Departments will have at
least one of these devices so that doses of radioactivity can be checked prior to administration to
patients.
Wikibooks | 59
Chapter 7
Here are some photographs of ionisation chambers designed for various applications:
An exposure-area product
detector used in radiography.
A range of ionisation chambers
of different volumes using for
measuring radiation exposure.
An exposure meter used in
radiography.
An isotope calibrator used in
nuclear medicine - the blue
cylinder on the left contains the
re-entrant chamber.
An exposure meter used in
radiography.
Geiger Counter
We saw earlier that the Geiger Counter operates at relatively high dc voltages (for example 300-
400 volts) and that an avalanche of electrons is generated following the absorption of radiation in the
60 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Gas-Filled Radiation Detectors
gas. The voltage pulses produced by this detector are relatively large since the gas effectively acts as an
amplifier of the electric charge produced.
There are four features of this detector which we will discuss. The first is that a sensitive amplifier
(as was the case with the Ionization Chamber) is not required for this detector because of the gas
amplification noted above.
The second feature results from the fact that the generation of the electron avalanche must be
stopped in order to reform the detector. In other words when a radiation particle/photon is absorbed by
the gas a complete gas breakdown occurs which implies that the gas is incapable of detecting the next
particle/photon which enters the detector. So in the extreme case one minute we have a radiation
detector and the following moment we do not.
A means of stopping the electron avalanche is therefore required - a process called Quenching.
One means of doing this is by electronically lowering the dc voltage following an avalanche. A more
widely used method of quenching is to add a small amount of a quenching gas to the inert gas. For
example the gas could be argon with ethyl alcohol added. The ethyl alcohol is in vapour form and since
it consists of relatively large molecules energy which would in their absence give rise to sustaining the
electron avalanche is absorbed by these molecules. The large molecules act like a brake in effect.
Irrespective of the type of quenching used the detector is insensitive for a small period of time
following absorption of a radiation particle/photon. This period of time is called the Dead Time and
this is the third feature of this detector which we will consider. Dead times are relatively short but
nevertheless significant - being typically of the order of 200-400 µs. As a result the reading obtained
with this detector is less than it should be. The true reading without going into detail can be obtained
using the following equation:
where T is the true reading, A is the actual reading and τ is the dead time. Some instruments
perform this calculation automatically.
The fourth feature to note about this detector is the dependence of its performance on the dc
voltage. The Geiger-Müller Region of our figure above is shown in more detail below:
Wikibooks | 61
Chapter 7
Notice that it contains a plateau where the count rate obtained is independent of the dc voltage.
The centre of this plateau is where most detectors are operated. It is clear that the count rate from the
detector is not affected if the dc voltage fluctuates about the operating voltage. This implies that a
relatively straight-forward dc voltage supply can be used. This feature coupled with the fact that a
sensitive amplifier is not needed translates in practice to a relatively inexpensive radiation detector.
External Links
• Inside a smoke detector - about the ion chamber used in smoke detectors - from the How
Stuff Works website.
• Ionisation Chambers - a brief description from the Triumf Safety Group.
• Radiation and Radioactivity - a self-paced lesson developed by the University of
Michigan's Student Chapter of the Health Physics Society with a section on gas filled detectors.
• The Geiger Counter - a brief overview from the NASA Goddard Space Flight Center, USA.
Multiple Choice Questions
Click HERE to access an online MCQ covering the material in this chapter.
congratulations on completing
CHAPTER 07 • GAS-FILLED RADIATION DETECTORS
live version • discussion • edit lesson • comment • report an error • ask a question
62 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Scintillation Detectors
CHAPTER 8 SCINTILLATION DETECTORS
Introduction
he second type of radiation detector we will discuss is called the scintillation Tdetector.
Scintillations are minute flashes of light which are produced by certain materials
when they absorb radiation. These materials are variously called fluorescent
materials, fluors, scintillators or phosphors.
live version
discussion
edit lesson
comment
report an error
ask a question
If we had a radioactive source and a scintillator in the lab we could darken the room, move the
scintillator close to the source and see the scintillations. These small flashes of light might be green or
blue or some other colour depending on the scintillator. We could also count the number of flashes
produced to gain an estimate of the radioactivity of the source, that is the more flashes of light seen the
more radiation present.
The scintillation detector was possibly the first radiation detector discovered. You might have
heard the story of the discovery of X-rays by Wilhelm Roentgen in 1895. He was working one evening
in his laboratory in Wurzburg, Germany with a device which fired a beam of electrons at a target inside
an evacuated glass tube. While working with this device he noticed that some platino-barium cyanide
crystals, which he just happened to have close by, began to glow - and that they stopped glowing when
he switched the device off. Roentgen had accidentally discovered a new form of radiation. He had also
accidentally discovered a scintillator detector.
Although scintillations can be seen we have a more sophisticated way of counting and measuring
them today by using some form of photodetector.
We will learn about the construction and mode of operation of this type of detector in this chapter.
In addition, we will see how it can be used not just for detecting the presence of ionizing radiation but
also for measuring the energy of that radiation.
Before we do however it is useful to note that scintillators are very widely used in the medical
radiations field. For example the X-ray cassette used in radiography contains a scintillator (called an
intensifying screen) in close contact with a photographic film. A second example is the X-ray Image
Intensifier used in fluoroscopy which contains scintillators called phosphors. Scintillators are also used
in some CT Scanners and as we will see in the next chapter, in the Gamma Camera and PET Scanner.
Their application is not limited to the medical radiations field in that scintillators are also used as
screens in television sets and computer monitors and for generating light in fluorescent tubes - to
mention just two common applications. What other applications can you think of?
So scintillators are a lot more common than you might initially think and you will therefore find
the information presented here useful to you not just for your studies of nuclear medicine.
Wikibooks | 63
Chapter 8
Fluorescent Materials
Some fluorescent materials are listed in the following table. Thallium-activated sodium iodide,
NaI(Tl) is a crystalline material which is widely used for the detection of gamma-rays in scintillation
detectors. We will be looking at this in more detail below.
Material Form
NaI (Tl) crystal
CsI (Na) crystal
CaWO4 crystal
ZnS (Ag) powder
p-terphenyl in toluene liquid
p-terphenyl in
polystyrene
plastic
Another crystalline material sodium-activated caesium iodide, CsI(Na) is widely used for X-ray
detection in devices such as the X-ray image intensifier. Another one called calcium tungstate, CaWO4
has been widely used in X-ray cassettes although this substance has been replaced by other scintillators
such as lanthanum oxybromide in many modern cassettes.
Notice that some scintillation materials are activated with certain elements. What this means is that
the base material has a small amount of the activation element present. The term doped is sometimes
used instead of activated. This activating element is used to influence the wavelength (colour) of the
light produced by the scintillator.
Silver-activated zinc sulphide is a scintillator in powder form and p-terphenyl in toluene is a liquid
scintillator. The advantage of such forms of scintillators is that the radioactive material can be placed in
close contact with the radioactive material. For example if a radioactive sample happened to be in
liquid form we could mix it with a liquid scintillator so as to optimise the chances of detection of the
emitted radiation and hence have a very sensitive detector.
A final example is p-terphenyl in polystyrene which is a scintillator in the form of a plastic. This
form can be easily made into different shapes like most plastics and is therefore useful when detectors
of particular shapes are required.
Photomultiplier Tube
A scintillator coupled to a photomultiplier tube (PMT) is illustrated in the following figure. The
overall device is typically cylindrical in shape and the figure shows a cross-section through this
cylinder:
64 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Scintillation Detectors
The scintillation crystal, NaI(Tl) is very delicate and this is one of the reasons it is housed in an
aluminium casing. The inside wall of the casing is designed so that any light which strikes it is
reflected downwards towards the PMT.
The PMT itself consists of a photocathode, a focussing grid, an array of dynodes and an anode
housed in an evacuated glass tube. The function of the photocathode is to convert the light flashes
produced by radiation attenuation in the scintillation crystal into electrons. The grid focuses these
electrons onto the first dynode and the dynode array is used for electron multiplication. We will
consider this process in more detail below. Finally the anode collects the electrons produced by the
array of dynodes.
The electrical circuitry which is typically attached to a PMT is shown in the next figure:
Wikibooks | 65
Chapter 8
It consists of a high voltage supply, a resistor divider chain and a load resistor, RL
. The high
voltage supply generates a dc voltage, Vdc which can be up to 1,000 volts. It is applied to the resistor
divider chain which consists of an array of resistors, each of which has the same resistance, R. The
function of this chain of resistors is to divide up Vdc into equal voltages which are supplied to the
dynodes. As a result voltages which increase in equal steps are applied to the array of dynodes. The
load resistor is used so that an output voltage, Vout can be generated.
Finally the operation of the device is illustrated in the figure below:
66 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Scintillation Detectors
The ionizing radiation produces flashes of light in the scintillation crystal. This light strikes the
photocathode and is converted into electrons. The electrons are directed by the grid onto the first
dynode.
Dynodes are made from certain alloys which emit electrons when their surface is struck by
electrons with the advantage that more electrons are emitted than are absorbed. A dynode used in a
PMT typically emits between two and five electrons for each electron which strikes it.
So when an electron from the photocathode strikes the first dynode between two and five electrons
are emitted and are directed towards the second dynode in the array (three are illustrated in the figure).
This electron multiplication process is repeated at the second dynode so that we end up with nine
electrons for example heading towards the third dynode. An electron avalanche therefore develops so
that a sizeable number of electrons eventually hits the anode at the bottom of the dynode chain.
These electrons flow through the load resistor, RL
and constitute an electric current which
according to Ohm's Law generates a voltage, Vout which is measured by electronic circuitry (which we
will describe later).
An animated graphic of the operation of the scintillation detector can be viewed by clicking
HERE.
A number of photographs of devices based on scintillation detection are shown below:
Wikibooks | 67
Chapter 8
An X-ray cassette used in
radiography.
A NaI crystal coupled to a
photomultiplier tube.
A number of identical
photomultiplier tubes from a
Gamma Camera.
A single channel analyser.
A single channel analyser with
a crystal-PMT assembly.
A well detector.
The important feature of the scintillation detector is that this output voltage, Vout is directly
proportional to the energy deposited by the radiation in the crystal. We will see what a useful feature
this is below. Before we do so we will briefly analyze the operation of this device.
Mathematical Model
A simple mathematical model will be presented below which will help us get a better handle on the
performance of a scintillation detector. We will do this by quantifying the performance of the
scintillator, the photocathode and the dynodes.
Let's use the following symbols to characterize each stage of the detection process:
• m: number of light photons produced in crystal
• k: optical efficiency of the crystal, that is the efficiency with which the crystal transmits
light
• l: quantum efficiency of the photocathode, that is the efficiency with which the
photocathode converts light photons to electrons
• n: number of dynodes
• R: dynode multiplication factor, that is the number of secondary electrons emitted by a
68 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Scintillation Detectors
dynode per primary electron absorbed.
Therefore the charge collected at the anode is given by the following equation:
where e: the electronic charge.
For example supposing a 100 keV gamma-ray is absorbed in the crystal. The number of light
photons produced, m, might be about 1,000 for a typical scintillation crystal. A typical crystal might
have an optical efficiency, k, of 0.5 - in other words 50% of the light produced reaches the
photocathode which might have a quantum efficiency of 0.15. A typical PMT has ten dynodes and let
us assume that the dynode multiplication factor is 4.5.
Therefore
This amount of charge is very small. Even though we have used a sophisticated photodetector like
a PMT we still end up with quite a small electrical signal.
A very sensitive amplifier is therefore needed to amplify this signal. This type of amplifier is
generally called a pre-amplifier and we will refer to it again later.
Output Voltage
We noted above that the voltage measured across the resistor, RL
, is proportional to the energy
deposited in the scintillation crystal by the radiation. Let us consider how the radiation might deposit its
energy in the crystal.
Let us consider a situation where gamma-rays are detected by the crystal. We learnt in Chapter 5
that there were two interaction mechanisms involved in gamma-ray attenuation - the Photoelectric
Effect and the Compton Effect. You will remember that the Photoelectric Effect involves the total
absorption of the energy of a gamma-ray, while the Compton Effect involves just partial absorption of
this energy. Since the output voltage of a scintillation detector is proportional to the energy deposited
by the gamma-rays it is reasonable to expect that Photoelectric Effects in the crystal will generate
distinct and relatively large output voltages and that Compton Effects will result in lower output
voltages.
The usual way of presenting this information is by plotting a graph of the count rate versus the
output voltage pulse height as shown in the following figure:
Wikibooks | 69
Chapter 8
This plot illustrates what is obtained for a monoenergetic gamma-emitting radioisotope, for
example
99mTc - which, as we have noted before emits a single gamma-ray with an energy of 140 keV.
Before we look at it in detail remember that we noted above that the output voltage from this
detector is proportional to the energy deposited by the radiation in the crystal. The horizontal axis can
therefore be used to represent the output voltage or the gamma-ray energy. Both of these quantities are
shown in the figure to help with this discussion. In addition note that this plot is often called a GammaRay Energy Spectrum.
The figure above contains two regions. One called the Photopeak and the other called the
Compton Smear. The Photopeak results because of Photoelectric absorption of the gamma-rays from
the radioactive source - remember that we are dealing with a monoenergetic emitter in this example. It
consists of a peak representing the gamma-ray energy (140 keV in our example). If our radioisotope
emitted gamma-rays of two energies we would have two photopeaks in our spectrum and so on.
Notice that the peak has a statistical spread. This has to do with how good our detector is and we
will not get into any detail about it here other than to note that the extent of this spread is a measure of
the quality of our detector. A high quality (and more expensive!) detector will have a narrower
statistical spread in the photopeaks which it measures.
The other component of our spectrum is the Compton Smear. It represents a range of output
voltages which are lower than that for the Photopeak. It is therefore indicative of the partial absorption
of the energy of gamma-rays in the crystal. In some Compton Effects a substantial scattering with a
valance electron can occur which gives rise to relatively large voltage pulses. In other Compton Effects
the gamma-ray just grazes off a valance electron with minimal energy transfer and hence a relatively
small voltage pulse is generated. In between these two extremes are a range of scattering events
involving a range of energy transfers and hence a range of voltage pulse heights. A 'smear' therefore
manifests itself on the gamma-ray energy spectrum.
It is important to note that the spectrum illustrated in the figure is simplified for the sake of this
introductory discussion and that actual spectra are a little more complex - see figure below for an
example:
70 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Scintillation Detectors
You will find though that your understanding of actual spectra can easily develop on the basis of the
simple picture we have painted here.
It is also important to appreciate the additional information which this type of radiation detector
provides relative to a gas-filled detector. In essence gas-filled detectors can be used to tell us if any
radiation is present as well as the amount of that radiation. Scintillation detectors also give us this
information but they tell us about the energy of this radiation as well. This additional information can
be used for many diverse applications such as the identification of unknown radioisotopes and the
production of nuclear medicine images. Let us stay a little bit longer though with the fundamental
features of how scintillation detectors work.
The photopeak of the Gamma-Ray Energy Spectrum is generally of interest in nuclear medicine.
This peak is the main signature of the radioisotope being used and its isolation from the Compton
Smear is normally achieved using a technique called Pulse Height Analysis.
Pulse Height Analysis
This is an electronic technique which allows a spectrum to be acquired using two types of
circuitry. One circuit is called a Lower Level Discriminator which only allows voltages pulses
through it which are lower than its setting. The other is called an Upper Level Discriminator which
only allows voltage pulses though which are (you guessed it!) higher than its setting.
The result of using both these circuits in combination is a variable-width window which can be
placed anywhere along a spectrum. For example if we wished to obtain information from the photopeak
only of our simplified spectrum we would place the discrimination controls as shown in the following
figure:
A final point to note here is that since the scintillation detector is widely used to obtain information
about the energies of the radiation emitted from a radioactive source it is frequently referred to as a
Scintillation Spectrometer.
Wikibooks | 71
Chapter 8
Scintillation Spectrometer
Types of scintillation spectrometer fall into two basic categories - the relatively straight-forward
Single Channel Analyser and the more sophisticated Multi-Channel Analyser.
The Single Channel Analyser is the type of instrument we have been describing so far in this
discussion. A block diagram of the instrument is shown below:
It consists of a scintillation crystal coupled to a photomultiplier tube which is powered by a
highvoltage circuit (H.V.). The output voltages are initially amplified by a sensitive pre-amplifier (PreAmp) as we noted above before being amplified further and conditioned by the amplifier (Amp).
The voltage pulses are then in a suitable form for the pulse height analyser (P.H.A.) - the output
pulses from which can be fed to a Scaler and a Ratemeter for display of the information about the
portion of the spectrum we have allowed to pass through the PHA. The Ratemeter is a display device
just like the speedometer in a car and indicates the number of pulses generated per unit time. The
Scaler on the other hand usually consists of a digital display which shows the number of voltage pulses
produced in a specified period of time.
72 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Scintillation Detectors
We can illustrate the operation of this circuitry by considering how it might be used to generate a
Gamma-Ray Energy Spectrum. What we would do is set up the LLD and ULD so as to define a narrow
window and place this to pass the lowest voltage pulses produced by the detector through to the Scaler
and Ratemeter. In other words we would place a narrow window at the extreme left of the spectrum
and acquire information about the lowest energy gamma-ray interactions in the crystal. We would then
adjust the LLD and ULD settings to acquire information about the interactions of the next highest
energy. We would proceed in this fashion to scan the whole spectrum.
A more sophisticated detector circuit is illustrated in the following figure:
It is quite similar to that in the previous figure with the exception that the PHA, Scaler and
Ratemeter are replaced by a Multi-Channel Analyser and a computer. The Multi-Channel Analyser
(MCA) is a circuit which is capable of setting up a large number of individual windows to look at a
complete spectrum in one go. The MCA might consist of 1024 individual windows for example and the
computer might consist of a personal computer which can acquire information simultaneously from
each window and display it as an energy spectrum. The computer generally contains software which
allows us to manipulate the resultant information in a variety of ways. Indeed the 137Cs spectrum
shown above was generated using this approach.
External Links
• Radiation and Radioactivity - a self-paced lesson developed by the University of
Michigan's Student Chapter of the Health Physics Society, with a section on sodium iodide
detectors.
Multiple Choice Questions
Click HERE to access an online MCQ covering the material in this chapter.
Wikibooks | 73
Chapter 8
congratulations on completing
CHAPTER 08 • SCINTILLATION DETECTORS
live version • discussion • edit lesson • comment • report an error • ask a question
74 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Nuclear Medicine Imaging Systems
CHAPTER 9 NUCLEAR MEDICINE IMAGING
SYSTEMS
Introduction
opics we have covered in this wikibook have included radioactivity, the
interaction of gamma-rays with matter and radiation detection. The main
reason for following this pathway was to bring us to the subject of this chapter:
nuclear medicine imaging systems. These are devices which produce pictures of
the distribution of radioactive material following administration to a patient.
T
live version
discussion
edit lesson
comment
report an error
ask a question
The radioactivity is generally administered to the patient in the form of a radiopharmaceutical - the
term radiotracer is also used. This follows some physiological pathway to accumulate for a short
period of time in some part of the body. A good example is
99mTc-tin colloid which following
intravenous injection accumulates mainly in the patient's liver. The substance emits gamma-rays while
it is in the patient's liver and we can produce an image of its distribution using a nuclear medicine
imaging system. This image can tell us whether the function of the liver is normal or abnormal or if
sections of it are damaged from some form of disease.
Different radiopharmaceuticals are used to produce images from almost all regions of the body:
Part of the Body Example Radiotracer
Brain
99mTc-Ceretec
Thyroid Na
99mTcO4
Lung
(Ventilation)
133Xe gas
Lung (Perfusion)
99mTc-MAA
Liver
99mTc-Tin Colloid
Spleen
99mTc-Damaged Red Blood
Cells
Pancreas 75Se-Selenomethionine
Kidneys 99mTc-DMSA
Note that the form of information obtained using this imaging method is mainly related to the
physiological functioning of an organ as opposed to the mainly anatomical information which is
obtained using X-ray imaging systems. Nuclear medicine therefore provides a different perspective on
Wikibooks | 75
Chapter 9
a disease condition and generates additional information to that obtained from X-ray images. Our
purpose here is to concentrate on the imaging systems used to produce the images.
Early forms of imaging system used in this field consisted of a radiation detector (a scintillation
detector for example) which was scanned slowly over a region of the patient in order to measure the
radiation intensity emitted from individual points within the region. One such device was called the
Rectilinear Scanner. Such imaging systems have been replaced since the 1970s by more sophisticated
devices which produce images much more rapidly. The most common of these modern devices is
called the Gamma Camera and we will consider its construction and mode of operation below.
Gamma Camera
The basic design of the most common type of gamma camera used today was developed by an
American physicist, Hal Anger and is therefore sometimes called the Anger Camera. It consists of a
large diameter NaI(Tl) scintillation crystal which is viewed by a large number of photomultiplier tubes.
A block diagram of the basic components of a gamma camera is shown below:
The crystal and PM Tubes are housed in a cylindrical shaped housing commonly called the
camera head and a cross-sectional view of this is shown in the figure. The crystal can be between
about 25 cm and 40 cm in diameter and about 1 cm thick. The diameter is dependent on the application
of the device. For example a 25 cm diameter crystal might be used for a camera designed for cardiac
applications while a larger 40 cm crystal would be used for producing images of the lungs. The
thickness of the crystal is chosen so that it provides good detection for the 140 keV gamma-rays
emitted from 99mTc - which is the most common radioisotope used today.
Scintillations produced in the crystal are detected by a large number of PM tubes which are
76 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Nuclear Medicine Imaging Systems
arranged in a two-dimensional array. There is typically between 37 and 91 PM tubes in modern gamma
cameras. The output voltages generated by these PM tubes are fed to a position circuit which produces
four output signals called ±X and ±Y. These position signals contain information about where the
scintillations were produced within the crystal. In the most basic gamma camera design they are fed to
a cathode ray oscilloscope (CRO). We will describe the operation of the CRO in more detail below.
Before we do so we should note that the position signals also contain information about the
intensity of each scintillation. This intensity information can be derived from the position signals by
feeding them to a summation circuit (marked ∑ in the figure) which adds up the four position signals to
generate a voltage pulse which represents the intensity of a scintillation. This voltage pulse is
commonly called the Z-pulse (or zee-pulse in American English!) which following pulse height
analysis (PHA) is fed as the unblank pulse to the CRO.
So we end up with four position signals and an unblank pulse sent to the CRO. Let us briefly
review the operation of a CRO before we continue. The core of a CRO consists of an evacuated tube
with an electron gun at one end and a phosphor-coated screen at the other end. The electon gun
generates an electron beam which is directed at the screen and the screen emits light at those points
struck by the electron beam. The position of the electron beam can be controlled by vertical and
horizontal deflection plates and with the appropriate voltages fed to these plates the electron beam can
be positioned at any point on the screen. The normal mode of operation of an oscilloscope is for the
electron beam to remain switched on. In the case of the gamma camera the electron beam of the CRO is
normally switched off - it is said to be blanked.
When an unblank pulse is generated by the PHA circuit the electron beam of the CRO is switched
on for a brief period of time so as to display a flash of light on the screen. In other words the voltage
pulse from the PHA circuit is used to unblank the electron beam of the CRO.
So where does this flash of light occur on the screen of the CRO? The position of the flash of light
is dictated by the ±X and ±Y signals generated by the position circuit. These signals as you might have
guessed are fed to the deflection plates of the CRO so as to cause the unblanked electron beam to strike
the screen at a point related to where the scintillation was originally produced in the NaI(Tl) crystal.
Simple!
The gamma camera can therefore be considered to be a sophisticated arrangement of electronic
circuits used to translate the position of a flash of light in a scintillation crystal to a flash of light at a
related point on the screen of an oscilloscope. In addition the use of a pulse height analyser in the
circuitry allows us to translate the scintillations related only to photoelectric events in the crystal by
rejecting all voltage pulses except those occurring within the photopeak of the gamma-ray energy
spectrum.
Let us summarise where we have got to before we proceed. A radiopharmaceutical is
administered to the patient and it accumulates in the organ of interest. Gamma-rays are emitted in all
directions from the organ and those heading in the direction of the gamma camera enter the crystal and
produce scintillations (note that there is a device in front of the crystal called a collimator which we
will discuss later). The scintillations are detected by an array of PM tubes whose outputs are fed to a
position circuit which generates four voltage pulses related to the position of a scintillation within the
crystal. These voltage pulses are fed to the deflection circuitry of the CRO. They are also fed to a
summation circuit whose ouput (the Z-pulse) is fed to the PHA and the output of the PHA is used to
switch on (that is, unblank) the electron beam of the CRO. A flash of light appears on the screen of the
Wikibooks | 77
Chapter 9
CRO at a point related to where the scintillation occurred within the NaI(Tl) crystal. An image of the
distribution of the radiopharmaceutical within the organ is therefore formed on the screen of the CRO
when the gamma-rays emitted from the organ are detected by the crystal.
What we have described above is the operation of a fairly traditional gamma camera. Modern
designs are a good deal more complex but the basic design has remained much the same as has been
described. One area where major design improvements have occured is the area of image formation and
display. The most basic approach to image formation is to photograph the screen of the CRO over a
period of time to allow integration of the light flashes to form an image on photographic film. A stage
up from this is to use a storage oscilloscope which allows each flash of light to remain on the screen for
a reasonable period of time.
The most modern approach is to feed the position signals into the memory circuitry of a computer
for storage. The memory contents can therefore be displayed on a computer monitor and can also be
manipulated (that is processed) in many ways. For example various colours can be used to represent
different concentrations of a radiopharmaceutical within an organ. Click HERE to access an online
demonstration of such digital image processing.
The use of such digital image processing is now widespread in nuclear medicine in that it can be
used to rapidly and conveniently control image acquisition and display as well as to analyse an image
or sequences of images, to annotate images with the patient's name and examination details, to store the
images for subsequent retrieval and to communicate the image data to other computers over a network.
Some photographs of gamma cameras and related devices are shown below:
A single-headed gamma
camera.
Another singleheaded gamma
camera.
The NaI crystal of a
gamma camera.
The cathode ray oscilloscope
(CRO) of a gamma camera.
The image processing
system of a gamma
camera.
A dual-headed
gamma camera.
Another view of a dualheaded gamma camera.
The image acquisition and
processing console of a dualheaded gamma camera.
We will continue with our description of the gamma camera by considering the construction and
purpose of the collimator.
78 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Nuclear Medicine Imaging Systems
Collimation
The collimator is a device which is attached to the front of the gamma camera head. It functions
something like a lens used in a photographic camera but this analogy is not quite correct because it is
rather difficult to focus gamma-rays. Nevertheless in its simplest form it is used to block out all gamma
rays which are heading towards the crystal except those which are travelling at right angles to the plane
of the crystal:
The figure illustrates a magnified view of a parallel-hole collimator attached to a crystal. The
collimator simply consists of a large number of small holes drilled in a lead plate. Notice that gammarays entering at an angle to the crystal get absorbed by the lead and that only those entering along the
direction of the holes get through to cause scintillations in the crystal. If the collimator was not in place
these obliquely incident gamma-rays would blur the images produced by the gamma camera. In other
words the images would not be very clear.
Most gamma cameras have a number of collimators which can be fitted depending on the
examination. The basic design of these collimators is the same except that they vary in terms of the
diameter of each hole, the depth of each hole and the thickness of lead between each hole (commonly
called the septum thickness). The choice of a specific collimator is dependent on the amount of
radiation absorption that occurs (which influences the sensitivity of the gamma camera), and the clarity
of images (that is the spatial resolution) it produces. Unfortunately these two factors are inversely
related in that the use of a collimator which produces images of good spatial resolution generally
implies that the instrument is not very sensitive to radiation.
Other collimator designs beside the parallel hole type are also in use. For example a diverging
hole collimator produces a minified image and converging hole and pin-hole collimators produce a
magnified image. The pin-hole collimator is illustrated in the following figure:
Wikibooks | 79
Illustration 2: Diagram of parallel-hole collimator attached to a
crystal of a gamma camera. Obliquely incident gamma-rays are
absorbed by the septa.
Chapter 9
A number of nuclear medicine images are shown below:
A SPECT slice of the
distribution of 99m-Tc
Ceretec within a
patient's brain.
A SPECT slice through a
patient's liver.
Four planar images from
a patient's bone scan
(clockwise from top left:
head, chest, knees and
pelvis).
A PET slice of a
patient's brain, with a
region of interest drawn
to indicate the skin
surface.
A thyroid scan
showing an outline
used for computing
thyroid uptake.
A series of planar images
acquired every 10 seconds
during a renogram of a
patient with a stone
blocking their right
kidney.
Selected images from a
renogram series.
A graphical display
showing the number of
counts in each kidney
versus time for a
renogram.
80 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Illustration 3: Diagram of a pin-hole collimator illustrating the
inversion of acquired images.
Nuclear Medicine Imaging Systems
A SPECT slice of a
patient's heart.
Posterior views from
ventilation (left) and
perfusion (right) scans of
a patient's lungs.
Emission Tomography
The form of imaging which we have been describing is called Planar Imaging. It produces a twodimensional image of a three-dimensional object. As a result images contain no depth information and
some details can be superimposed on top of each other and obscured or partially obscured as a result.
Note that this is also a feature of conventional X-ray imaging.
The usual way of trying to overcome this limitation is to take at least two views of the patient, one
from the front and one from the side for example. So in chest radiography a posterio-anterior (PA) and
a lateral view can be taken. And in a nuclear medicine liver scan an antero-posterior (AP) and lateral
scan are taken.
This limitation of planar X-ray imaging was overcome by the development of the CAT Scanner
about 1970 or thereabouts. CAT stands for Computerised Axial Tomography or Computer Assisted
Tomography and today the term is often shortened to Computed Tomography or CT scanning (the term
tomography comes from the Greek word tomos meaning slice). Irrespective of its exact name the
technique allows images of slices through the body to be produced using a computer. It does this in
essence by taking X-ray images at a number of angles around the patient. These slice images show the
third dimension which is missing from planar images and thus eliminate the problem of superimposed
details. Furthermore images of a number of successive slices through a region of the patient can be
stacked on top of each other using the computer to produce a three-dimensional image. Clearly CT
scanning is a very powerful imaging technique which is far superior to planar imaging.
The equivalent nuclear medicine imaging technique is called Emission Computed Tomography.
We will consider two implementations of this technique below.
(a) Single Photon Emission Computed Tomography (SPECT)
This SPECT technique uses a gamma camera to record images at a series of angles around the
patient. These images are then subjected to a form of digital image processing called Image
Reconstruction in order to compute images of slices through the patient.
The Filtered Back Projection reconstruction process is illustrated below. Let us assume for
simplicity that the slice through the patient actually consists of a 2x2 voxel array with the radioactivity
in each voxel given by A1...A4:
Wikibooks | 81
Chapter 9
The first projection, P1, is imaged from the right and the second projection, P2, from the right oblique
and so on. The projections are firstly added to each as shown below:
82 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Nuclear Medicine Imaging Systems
and the summed (or superimposed) projections are normalised to generate an estimate of the
radioactivity in each voxel.
An alternative image reconstruction technique is called Iterative Reconstruction. This is a
successive approximation technique as illustrated below:
Projection Patient Additive Iterative Reconstruction
P1
Actual projection, P1. First estimate of image matrix.
Wikibooks | 83
Chapter 9
P2
Actual projection, P2.
Estimate of projection, P2.
Second estimate of image matrix.
84 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Nuclear Medicine Imaging Systems
P3 Actual projection, P3. Estimate of projection, P3.
Third estimate of image matrix.
Wikibooks | 85
Chapter 9
P4
Actual projection, P4.
Estimate of projection, P4.
Fourth estimate of image matrix.
The first estimate of the image matrix is made by distributing the first projection, P1, evenly
through an empty pixel matrix. The second projection, P2, is compared to the same projection from the
estimated matrix and the difference between actual and estimated projections is added to the estimated
matrix. The process is repeated for all other projections.
The gamma camera is typiclly rotated around the patient in order to acquire the images. Modern
gamma cameras which are designed specifically for SPECT scanning can consist of two camera heads
mounted parallel to each other with the patient in between. The time required to produce images is
therefore reduced by a factor of about two. In addition some SPECT gamma cameras designed for
brain scanning have three camera heads mounted in a triangular arrangement.
A comparison of these image reconstruction techniques is shown below for a slice through a
ventilation scan of a patient's lungs:
86 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Nuclear Medicine Imaging Systems
(b) Positron Emission Tomography (PET)
You will remember from chapter 2 that positrons can be emitted from radioactive nuclei which
have too many neutrons for stability. You will also remember that positrons do not last for very long in
matter since they will quickly encounter an electron and a process called annihilation results. In the
process the positron and electron vanish and their energy is converted into two gamma-rays which are
emitted at 180o
degrees to each other. The emission is often referred to as two back-to-back gammarays and they each have a discrete energy of 0.51 MeV.
So if we administer a positron-emitting radiopharmaceutical to a patient an emitted positrons can
annihilate with a nearby electon and two gamma-rays will be emitted in opposite directions. These
gamma-rays can be detected using a ring of radiation detectors encircling the patient and tomographic
images can be generated using a computer system. The detectors are typically specialised scintillation
devices which are optimised for detection of the 0.51 MeV gamma-rays. This ring of detectors,
associated apparatus and computer system are called a PET Scanner:
Wikibooks | 87
Chapter 9
The locations of positron decays within the patient are highlighted by the solid circles in the above
diagram. In addition only a few detectors are shown in the diagram for reasons of clarity. Each detector
around the ring is operated in coincidence with a bank of opposing detectors and the annihilation
gamma-rays thus detected are used to build up a single profile.
It has also been found that gamma cameras fitted with thick crystals and special collimators can be
used for PET scanning.
The radioisotopes used for PET scanning include 11C, 13N,
15O and 18F. These isotopes are usually
produced using an instrument called a cyclotron. In addition these isotopes have relatively short half
lives. PET scanning therefore needs a cyclotron and associated radiopharmaceutical production
facilities located close by. We will be considering cyclotrons in the next and final chapter of this
wikibook.
A number of photographs of a PET scanner are shown below:
The detectors and
associated electronic The scanner itself - the
Another view of the
detectors.
The image processing
computer.
88 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Nuclear Medicine Imaging Systems
circuitry.
detectors are under the
covering panel.
External Links
• Centre for Positron Emission Tomography at the Austin & Repatriation Medical Centre,
Melbourne with sections on what PET is, current facilities, projects & research and a PET
image library.
• Online Learning Tools - an advanced treatment from the Department of Radiology,
Brigham and Women's Hospital, USA containing nuclear medicine teaching files, an atlas of
myocardial perfusion SPECT, an atlas of brain perfusion SPECT and the physical
characteristics of nuclear medicine images.
• The Power of Molecular Imaging - a brochure all about Positron Emission Tomography
(PET) from the Department of Molecular & Medical Pharmacology, University of California
LA, USA.
Multiple Choice Questions
Click HERE to access an online MCQ covering the material in this chapter.
congratulations on completing
CHAPTER 09 • NUCLEAR MEDICINE IMAGING SYSTEMS
live version • discussion • edit lesson • comment • report an error • ask a question
Wikibooks | 89
Chapter 10
CHAPTER 10 PRODUCTION OF RADIOISOTOPES
Introduction
Most of the radioisotopes found in nature have relatively long half lives. They also
belong to elements which are not handled well by the human body. As a result
medical applications generally require the use of radioisotopes which are produced
artificially.
We have looked at the subject of radioactivity in earlier chapters of this wikibook
and have then progressed to cover the interaction of radiation with matter,
radiation detectors and imaging systems. We return to sources of radioactivity in
this chapter in order to learn about methods which are used to make radioisotopes.
live version
discussion
edit lesson
comment
report an error
ask a question
The type of radioisotope of value to nuclear medicine imaging should have characteristics which
keep the radiation dose to the patient as low as possible. For this reason they generally have a short half
life and emit only gamma-rays - that is no alpha-particle or beta-particle emissions. From an energy
point of view the gamma-ray energy should not be so low that the radiation gets completely absorbed
before emerging from the patient's body and not too high that it is difficult to detect. For this reason
most of the radioisotopes used emit gamma-rays of medium energy, that is between about 100 and 200
keV. Finally since the radioisotope needs to be incorporated into some form of radiopharmaceutical it
should also be capable of being produced in a form which is amenable to chemical, pharmaceutical and
sterile processing.
The production methods we will consider are nuclear fission, nuclear bombardment and the
radioisotope generator.
Nuclear Fission
We were introduced to spontaneous fission in chapter 2 where we saw that a heavy nucleus can
break into a number of fragments. This disintegration process can be induced to occur when certain
heavy nuclei absorb neutrons. Following absorption of a neutron such nuclei break into smaller
fragments with atomic numbers between about 30 and 65. Some of these new nuclei are of value to
nuclear medicine and can be separated from other fission fragments using chemical processes.
The fission process is controlled inside a device called a nuclear reactor. One such reactor exists in
Australia at Lucas Heights in New South Wales and many others exist throughout the world.
Nuclear Bombardment
In this method of radioisotope production charged particles are accelerated up to very high
energies and caused to collide into a target material. Examples of such charged particles are protons,
alpha particles and deuterons. New nuclei can be formed when these particles collide with nuclei in the
target material. Some of these nuclei are of value to nuclear medicine.
90 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Production of Radioisotopes
An example of this method is the production of 22Na where a target of 24Mg is bombarded with
deuterons, that is
A deuteron you will remember from chapter 1 is the second most common isotope of hydrogen,
that is
2H. When it collides with a
24Mg nucleus a
22Na nucleus plus an alpha particle is produced. The
target is exposed to the deuterons for a period of time and is subsequently processed chemically in
order to separate out the 22Na nuclei.
The type of device commonly used for this method of radioisotope production is called a
cyclotron. It consists of an ion gun for producing the charged particles, electrodes for accelerating them
to high energies and a magnet for steering them towards the target material. All arranged in a circular
structure.
Radioisotope Generator
This method is widely used to produce certain short-lived radioisotopes in a hospital or clinic. It
involves obtaining a relatively long-lived radioisotope which decays into the short-lived isotope of
interest.
A good example is
99mTc which as we have noted before is the most widely used radioisotope in
nuclear medicine today. This isotope has a half-life of six hours which is rather short if we wish to have
it delivered directly from a nuclear facility. Instead the nuclear facility supplies the isotope 99Mo which
decays into
99mTc with a half life of about 2.75 days. The 99Mo is called the parent isotope and 99mTc
is called the daughter isotope.
So the nuclear facility produces the parent isotope which decays relatively slowly into the daughter
isotope and the daughter is separated chemically from the parent at the hospital/clinic. The chemical
separation device is called, in this example, a 99mTc Generator:
Wikibooks | 91
Chapter 10
It consists of a ceramic column with
99Mo adsorbed onto its top surface. A solution called an
eluent is passed through the column, reacts chemically with any 99mTc and emerges in a chemical form
which is suitable for combining with a pharmaceutical to produce a radiopharmaceutical. The
arrangement shown in the figure above is called a Positive Pressure system where the eluent is forced
through the ceramic column by a pressure, slightly above atmospheric pressure, in the eluent vial.
The ceramic column and collection vials need to be surrounded by lead shielding for radiation
protection purposes. In addition all components are produced and need to be maintained in a sterile
condition since the collected solution will be administered to patients.
Finally an Isotope Calibrator is needed when a
99mTc Generator is used to determine the
radioactivity for preparation of patient doses and to check whether any 99Mo is present in the collected
solution.
A number of photographs taken in nuclear medicine hot labs are shown below:
92 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Production of Radioisotopes
Five 99m-Tc generators.
Pb shielding surrounding the
laminar flow cabinet, where
radiopharmaceuticals are
prepared.
Another view of the Pb
shielding surrounding a laminar
flow cabinet.
External Links
• Cyclotron Java Applet - a Java-based interactive demostration of the operation of a
cyclotron from GFu-Kwun Hwang, Dept. of Physics, National Taiwan Normal University,
Virtual Physics Laboratory.
• Nuclear Power Plant Demonstration - a Java-based interactive demonstration of controlling
a nuclear reactor. Also contains nuclear power information links.
• ANSTO's HIFAR Reactor - details about the nuclear reactor at Lucas Heights, NSW.
• Medical Valley - contains information on what nuclear medicine is, production of nuclear
pharmaceuticals, molybdenum and technetium - from The Netherlands Energy Research
Foundation Petten.
Multiple Choice Questions
Click HERE to access an online MCQ covering the material in this chapter.
congratulations on completing
CHAPTER 10 • PRODUCTION OF RADIOISOTOPES
live version • discussion • edit lesson • comment • report an error • ask a question
Wikibooks | 93
Chapter 11
CHAPTER 11 CHAPTER REVIEW
Review of Atomic & Nuclear Structure
• The atom consists of two components - a nucleus (positively charged) and
an electron cloud (negatively charged);
• The radius of the nucleus is about 10,000 times smaller than that of the
atom;
• The nucleus can have two component particles - neutrons (no charge) and
protons (positively charged) - collectively called nucleons;
live version
discussion
edit lesson
comment
report an error
ask a question
• The mass of a proton is about equal to that of a neutron - and is about 1,840 times that of an
electron;
• The number of protons equals the number of electrons in an isolated atom;
• The Atomic Number specifies the number of protons in a nucleus;
• The Mass Number specifies the number of nucleons in a nucleus;
• Isotopes of elements have the same atomic number but different mass numbers;
• Isotopes are classified by specifying the element's chemical symbol preceded by a
superscript giving the mass number and a subscript giving the atomic number;
• The atomic mass unit is defined as 1/12th the mass of the stable, most commonly
occurring isotope of carbon (i.e. C-12);
• Binding energy is the energy which holds the nucleons together in a nucleus and is
measured in electron volts (eV);
• To combat the effect of the increase in electrostatic repulsion as the number of protons
increases, the number of neutrons increases more rapidly - giving rise to the Nuclear Stability
Curve;
• There are ~2450 isotopes of ~100 elements and the unstable isotopes lie above or below the
Nuclear Stability Curve;
• Unstable isotopes attempt to reach the stability curve by splitting into fragments (fission) or
by emitting particles/energy (radioactivity);
• Unstable isotopes <=> radioactive isotopes <=> radioisotopes <=> radionuclides;
• ~300 of the ~2450 isotopes are found in nature - the rest are produced artificially.
Review of Radioactive Decay
• Fission: Some heavy nuclei decay by splitting into 2 or 3 fragments plus some neutrons.
These fragments form new nuclei which are usually radioactive;
• Alpha Decay: Two protons and two neutrons leave the nucleus together in an assembly
known as an alpha-particle;
• An alpha-particle is a He-4 nucleus;
• Beta Decay - Electron Emission: Certain nuclei with an excess of neutrons may reach
stability by converting a neutron into a proton with the emission of a beta-minus particle;
• A beta-minus particle is an electron;
• Beta Decay - Positron Emission: When the number of protons in a nucleus is in excess,
the nucleus may reach stability by converting a proton into a neutron with the emission of a
beta-plus particle;
94 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Chapter Review
• A beta-plus particle is a positron;
• Positrons annihilate with electrons to produce two back-to-back gamma-rays;
• Beta Decay - Electron Capture: An inner orbital electron is attracted into the nucleus
where it combines with a proton to form a neutron;
• Electron capture is also known as K-capture;
• Following electron capture, the excited nucleus may give off some gamma-rays. In
addition, as the vacant electron site is filled, an X-ray is emitted;
• Gamma Decay - Isomeric Transition: A nucleus in an excited state may reach its ground
state by the emission of a gamma-ray;
• A gamma-ray is an electromagnetic photon of high energy;
• Gamma Decay - Internal Conversion: the excitation energy of an excited nucleus is given
to an atomic electron.
Review of the Radioactive Decay Law
• The radioactive decay law in equation form;
• Radioactivity is the number of radioactive decays per unit time;
• The decay constant is defined as the fraction of the initial number of radioactive nuclei
which decay in unit time;
• Half Life: The time taken for the number of radioactive nuclei in the sample to reduce by a
factor of two;
• Half Life = (0.693)/(Decay Constant);
• The SI Unit of radioactivity is the becquerel (Bq)
• 1 Bq = one radioactive decay per second;
• The traditional unit of radioactivity is the curie (Ci);
• 1 Ci = 3.7 x 1010 radioactive decays per second.
Review of Units of Radiation Measurement
• Exposure expresses the intensity of an X- or gamma-ray beam;
• The SI unit of exposure is the coulomb per kilogram (C/kg);
• 1 C/kg = The quantity of X- or gamma-rays such that the associated electrons emitted per
kg of air at STP produce in air ions carrying 1 coulomb of electric charge;
• The traditional unit of exposure is the roentgen (R);
• 1 R = The quantity of X- or gamma-rays such that the associated electrons emitted per kg
of air at STP produce in air ions carrying 2.58 x 10-4 coulombs of electric charge;
• The exposure rate is the exposure per unit time, e.g. C/kg/s;
• Absorbed dose is the radiation energy absorbed per unit mass of absorbing material;
• The SI unit of absorbed dose is the gray (Gy);
• 1 Gy = The absorption of 1 joule of radiation energy per kilogram of material;
• The traditional unit of absorbed dose is the rad;
• 1 rad = The absorption of 10-2 joules of radiation energy per kilogram of material;
• The Specific Gamma-Ray Constant expresses the exposure rate produced by the gammarays from a radioisotope;
• The Specific Gamma-Ray Constant is expressed in SI units in C/kg/s/Bq at 1 m;
• Exposure from an X- or gamma-ray source follows the Inverse Square Law and decreases
Wikibooks | 95
Chapter 11
with the square of the distance from the source.
Review of the Interaction of Radiation with Matter
• Alpha-Particles:
• exert considerable electrostatic attraction on the outer orbital electrons of atoms near
which they pass and cause ionisations;
• travel in straight lines - except for rare direct collisions with nuclei of atoms in their
path;
• energy is always discrete.
• Beta-Minus Particles:
• attracted by nuclei and repelled by electron clouds as they pass through matter and
cause ionisations;
• have a tortuous path;
• have a range of energies;
• range of energies results because two particles are emitted - a beta-particle and a
neutrino.
• Gamma-Rays:
• energy is always discrete;
• have many modes of interaction with matter;
• important interactions for nuclear medicine imaging (and radiography) are the
Photoelectric Effect and the Compton Effect.
• Photoelectric Effect:
• when a gamma-ray collides with an orbital electron, it may transfer all its energy to
the electron and cease to exist;
• the electron can leave the atom with a kinetic energy equal to the energy of the
gamma-ray less the orbital binding energy;
• a positive ion is formed when the electron leaves the atom;
• the electron is called a photoelectron;
• the photoelectron can cause further ionisations;
• subsequent X-ray emission as the orbital vacancy is filled.
• Compton Effect:
• A gamma-ray may transfer only part of its energy to a valence electron which is
essentially free; ** gives rise to a scattered gamma-ray;
• is sometimes called Compton Scatter;
• a positive ion results;
• Attenuation is term used to describe both absorption and scattering of radiation.
Review of Attenuation of Gamma-Rays
• Attenuation of a narrow-beam of gamma-rays increases as the thickness, the density and
the atomic number of the absorber increases;
• Attenuation of a narrow-beam of gamma-rays decreases as the energy of the gamma-rays
increases;
• Attenuation of a narrow beam is described by an equation;
• the Linear Attenuation Coefficient is defined as the fraction of the incident intensity
96 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Chapter Review
absorbed in a unit distance of the absorber;
• Linear attenuation coefficients are usually expressed in units of cm-1;
• the Half Value Layer is the thickness of absorber required to reduce the intensity of a
radiation beam by a factor of 2;
• Half Value Layer = (0.693)/(Linear Attenuation Coefficient);
• the Mass Attenuation Coefficient is given by the linear attenuation coefficient divided by
the density of the absorber;
• Mass attenuation coefficients are usually expressed in units of cm2
 g-1
.
Review of Gas-Filled Detectors
• Gas-filled detectors include the ionisation chamber, the proportional counter and the
Geiger counter;
• They operate on the basis of ionisation of gas atoms by the incident radiation, where the
positive ions and electrons produced are collected by electrodes;
• An ion pair is the term used to describe a positive ion and an electron;
• The operation of gas-filled detectors is critically dependent on the magnitude of the applied
dc voltage;
• The output voltage of an ionisation chamber can be calculated on the basis of the
capacitance of the chamber;
• A very sensitive amplifier is required to measure voltage pulses produced by an ionisation
chamber;
• The gas in ionisation chambers is usually air;
• Ionisation chambers are typically used to measure radiation exposure (in a device called an
Exposure Meter) and radioactivity (in a device called an Isotope Calibrator);
• The total charge collected in a proportional counter may be up to 1000 times the charge
produced initially by the radiation;
• The initial ionisation triggers a complete gas breakdown in a Geiger counter;
• The gas in a Geiger counter is usually an inert gas;
• The gas breakdown must be stopped in order to prepare the Geiger counter for a new event
by a process called quenching;
• Two types of quenching are possible: electronic quenching and the use of a quenching gas;
• Geiger counters suffer from dead time, a small period of time following the gas breakdown
when the counter is inoperative;
• The true count rate can be determined from the actual count rate and the dead time using an
equation;
• The value of the applied dc voltage in a Geiger counter is critical, but high stability is not
required.
Review of Scintillation Detectors
• NaI(Tl) is a scintillation crystal widely used in nuclear medicine;
• The crystal is coupled to a photomultiplier tube to generate a voltage pulse representing
the energy deposited in the crystal by the radiation;
• A very sensitive amplifier is needed to measure such voltage pulses;
• The voltages pulses range in amplitude depending on how the radiation interacts with the
Wikibooks | 97
Chapter 11
crystal, i.e. the pulses form a spectrum whose shape depends on the interaction mechanisms
involved, e.g. for medium-energy gamma-rays used in in-vivo nuclear medicine: the Compton
effect and the Photoelectric effect;
• A Gamma-Ray Energy Spectrum for a medium-energy, monoenergetic gamma-ray
emitter consists (simply) of a Compton Smear and a Photopeak;
• Pulse Height Analysis is used to discriminate the amplitude of voltage pulses;
• A pulse height analyser (PHA) consists of a lower level discriminator (which passes
voltage pulses which are than its setting) and an upper level discriminator (which passes
voltage pulses lower than its setting);
• The result is a variable width window which can be placed anywhere along a spectrum, or
used to scan a spectrum;
• A single channel analyser (SCA) consists of a single PHA with a scaler and a ratemeter;
• A multi-channel analyser (MCA) is a computer-controlled device which can acquire data
from many windows simultaneously.
Review of Nuclear Medicine Imaging Systems
• A gamma camera consists of a large diameter (25-40 cm) NaI(Tl) crystal, ~1 cm thick;
• The crystal is viewed by an array of 37-91 PM tubes;
• PM tubes signals are processed by a position circuit which generates +/- X and +/- Y
signals;
• These position signals are summed to form a Z signal which is fed to a pulse height
analyser;
• The +/- X, +/- Y and discriminated Z signals are sent to a computer for digital image
processing;
• A collimator is used to improve the spatial resolution of a gamma-camera;
• Collimators typically consist of a Pb plate containing a large number of small holes;
• The most common type is a parallel multi-hole collimator;
• The most resolvable area is directly in front of a collimator;
• Parallel-hole collimators vary in terms of the number of holes, the hole diameter, the length
of each hole and the septum thickness - the combination of which affect the sensitivity and
spatial resolution of the imaging system;
• Other types include the diverging-hole collimator (which generates minified images), the
converging-hole collimator (which generates magnified images) and the pin-hole collimator
(which generates magnified inverted images);
• Conventional imaging with a gamma camera is referred to as Planar Imaging, i.e. a 2D
image portraying a 3D object giving superimposed details and no depth information;
• Single Photon Emission Computed Tomography (SPECT) produces images of slices
through the body;
• SPECT uses a gamma camera to record images at a series of angles around the patient;
• The resultant data can be processed using Filtered Back Projection and Iterative
Reconstruction;
• SPECT gamma-cameras can have one, two or three camera heads;
• Positron Emission Tomography (PET) also produces images of slices through the body;
• PET exploits the positron annihilation process where two 0.51 MeV back-to-back gammarays are produced;
• If these gamma-rays are detected, their origin will lie on a line joining two of the detectors
of the ring of detectors which encircles the patient;
98 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
Chapter Review
• A Time-of-Flight method can be used to localise their origin;
• PET systems require on-site or nearby cyclotron to produce short-lived radioisotopes, such
as C-11, N-13, O-15 and F-18.
Review of the Production of Radioisotopes
• Naturally-occurring radioisotopes generally have long half lives and belong to relatively
heavy elements - and are therefore unsuitable for medical diagnostic applications;
• Medical diagnostic radioisotopes are generally produced artificially;
• The fission process can be exploited so that radioisotopes of interest can be separated
chemically from fission products;
• A cyclotron can be used to accelerate charged particles up to high energies so that they to
collide into a target of the material to be activated;
• A radioisotope generator is generally used in hospitals to produce short-lived radioisotopes;
• A technetium-99m generator consists of an alumina column containing Mo-99, which
decays into Tc-99m;
• Saline is passed through the generator to elute the Tc-99m - the resulting solution is called
sodium pertechnetate;
• Both positive pressure and negative pressure generators are in use;
• An isotope calibrator is needed when a Tc-99m generator is used in order to determine the
activity for preparation of patient doses and to test whether any Mo-99 is present in the
collected solution.
Exercise Questions
1. Discuss the process of radioactive decay from the perspective of the nuclear stability curve.
2. Describe in detail FOUR common forms of radioactive decay.
3. Give the equation which expresses the Radioactive Decay Law, and explain the meaning of
each of its terms.
4. Define each of the following:
• Half life
• Decay Constant
• Becquerel.
5. A sample of radioactive substance is found to have an activity of 100 kBq. Its radioactivity
is measured again 82 days later and is found to be 15 kBq. Calculate:
• the half-life;
• the decay constant.
6. Define each of the following radiation units:
• Roentgen;
• Becquerel;
• Gray;
• Seivert.
7. Estimate the exposure rate at 1 metre from a 100 MBq source of radioactivity which has a
Specific Gamma Ray Constant of 50 mR per hour per MBq at 1 cm.
8. Briefly describe the basic principle of operation of gas-filled radiation detectors.
9. Illustrate using a graph how the magnitude of the voltage pulses from a gas-filled radiation
Wikibooks | 99
Chapter 11
detector varies with applied voltage and identify on the graph the regions associated with the
operation of Ionisation Chambers and the Geiger Counters.
10.Describe the construction and principles of operation of a scintillation spectrometer.
11.Discuss the components of the energy spectrum from a monoenergetic, medium energy
gamma- emitting radioisotope obtained using a scintillation spectrometer on the basis of how
the gamma-rays interact with the scintillation crystal.
12.Describe the construction and principles of operation of a Gamma Camera.
13.Compare features of three types of collimator which can be used with a Gamma Camera.
Multiple Choice Questions
Click HERE to access over one hundred online multiple choice questions covering this wikibook.
congratulations on completing the
CHAPTER REVIEW
live version • discussion • edit lesson • comment • report an error • ask a question
100 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
History & Document Notes
CHAPTER 12 HISTORY & DOCUMENT NOTES
Wikibook History
This book was created on 2004-01-31 and was developed on the Wikibooks project by the
contributors listed in a subsequent section. The latest version may be found at
http://en.wikibooks.org/wiki/Basic_Physics_of_Nuclear_Medicine.
PDF Information & History
This PDF was created on 2006-08-12 based on the 2006-08-11 version of the Basic Physics of
Nuclear Medicine Wikibook. A Transparent copy of this Document is available at Wikibooks:Basic
Physics of Nuclear Medicine/Printable version. An OpenDocument Text version of this PDF document
and the template from which it was created is available upon request at Wikibooks:User talk:Hagindaz.
A printer-friendly version of this document may be available at Wikibooks:Image:Basic Physics of
Nuclear Medicine printable version.pdf.
Document Information
• Pages: 109
• Paragraphs: 1240
• Words: 30890
• Characters: 181740
Wikibooks | 101
Chapter 13
CHAPTER 13 AUTHORS, BIBLIOGRAPHY, &
IMAGE CREDITS
Principal Authors
• Kieran Maher (Contributions)
All Authors
KieranMaher, Anonymous, The Doc, Paul Lynch, Derbeth, Jguk, Hagindaz, Yes, Willy on Wheels
bought a Macbook, enjoy Willy OS X!, Wereon
Bibliography
Basic Science of Nuclear Medicine, 2nd Ed., RP Parker, PHS Smith, DH Taylor (Churchill
Livingstone, 1984)
Introduction to Nuclear Physics, H Enge (Addison-Wesley, 1966)
Physics in Nuclear Medicine, JA Sorenson and ME Phelps (Grune & Stratton, 1980)
Radioisotope Techniques in Clinical Research and Diagnosis, N Veall and H Vetter
(Butterworths, 1958)
Radionuclide Techniques in Medicine, JM McAlister (Cambridge University Press, 1979).
Image Credits
Cover: Scheme of an atom, designed by Miraceti, and licensed under the GFDL.
Unless noted otherwise above, all included images have been released into the public domain.
Unless noted otherwise above, all included images have been made by Kieran Maher.
102 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
GNU Free Documentation License
CHAPTER 14 GNU FREE DOCUMENTATION
LICENSE
Version 1.2, November 2002
Copyright (C) 2000,2001,2002 Free Software Foundation, Inc.
51 Franklin St, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA 02110-1301 USA
Everyone is permitted to copy and distribute verbatim copies
of this license document, but changing it is not allowed.
0. PREAMBLE
The purpose of this License is to make a manual, textbook, or other functional and useful
document "free" in the sense of freedom: to assure everyone the effective freedom to copy and
redistribute it, with or without modifying it, either commercially or noncommercially. Secondarily, this
License preserves for the author and publisher a way to get credit for their work, while not being
considered responsible for modifications made by others.
This License is a kind of "copyleft", which means that derivative works of the document must
themselves be free in the same sense. It complements the GNU General Public License, which is a
copyleft license designed for free software.
We have designed this License in order to use it for manuals for free software, because free
software needs free documentation: a free program should come with manuals providing the same
freedoms that the software does. But this License is not limited to software manuals; it can be used for
any textual work, regardless of subject matter or whether it is published as a printed book. We
recommend this License principally for works whose purpose is instruction or reference.
1. APPLICABILITY AND DEFINITIONS
This License applies to any manual or other work, in any medium, that contains a notice placed by
the copyright holder saying it can be distributed under the terms of this License. Such a notice grants a
world-wide, royalty-free license, unlimited in duration, to use that work under the conditions stated
herein. The "Document", below, refers to any such manual or work. Any member of the public is a
licensee, and is addressed as "you". You accept the license if you copy, modify or distribute the work
in a way requiring permission under copyright law.
A "Modified Version" of the Document means any work containing the Document or a portion of
it, either copied verbatim, or with modifications and/or translated into another language.
A "Secondary Section" is a named appendix or a front-matter section of the Document that deals
exclusively with the relationship of the publishers or authors of the Document to the Document's
overall subject (or to related matters) and contains nothing that could fall directly within that overall
subject. (Thus, if the Document is in part a textbook of mathematics, a Secondary Section may not
Wikibooks | 103
Chapter 14
explain any mathematics.) The relationship could be a matter of historical connection with the subject
or with related matters, or of legal, commercial, philosophical, ethical or political position regarding
them.
The "Invariant Sections" are certain Secondary Sections whose titles are designated, as being those
of Invariant Sections, in the notice that says that the Document is released under this License. If a
section does not fit the above definition of Secondary then it is not allowed to be designated as
Invariant. The Document may contain zero Invariant Sections. If the Document does not identify any
Invariant Sections then there are none.
The "Cover Texts" are certain short passages of text that are listed, as Front-Cover Texts or BackCover Texts, in the notice that says that the Document is released under this License. A Front-Cover
Text may be at most 5 words, and a Back-Cover Text may be at most 25 words.
A "Transparent" copy of the Document means a machine-readable copy, represented in a format
whose specification is available to the general public, that is suitable for revising the document
straightforwardly with generic text editors or (for images composed of pixels) generic paint programs
or (for drawings) some widely available drawing editor, and that is suitable for input to text formatters
or for automatic translation to a variety of formats suitable for input to text formatters. A copy made in
an otherwise Transparent file format whose markup, or absence of markup, has been arranged to thwart
or discourage subsequent modification by readers is not Transparent. An image format is not
Transparent if used for any substantial amount of text. A copy that is not "Transparent" is called
"Opaque".
Examples of suitable formats for Transparent copies include plain ASCII without markup, Texinfo
input format, LaTeX input format, SGML or XML using a publicly available DTD, and standardconforming simple HTML, PostScript or PDF designed for human modification. Examples of
transparent image formats include PNG, XCF and JPG. Opaque formats include proprietary formats
that can be read and edited only by proprietary word processors, SGML or XML for which the DTD
and/or processing tools are not generally available, and the machine-generated HTML, PostScript or
PDF produced by some word processors for output purposes only.
The "Title Page" means, for a printed book, the title page itself, plus such following pages as are
needed to hold, legibly, the material this License requires to appear in the title page. For works in
formats which do not have any title page as such, "Title Page" means the text near the most prominent
appearance of the work's title, preceding the beginning of the body of the text.
A section "Entitled XYZ" means a named subunit of the Document whose title either is precisely
XYZ or contains XYZ in parentheses following text that translates XYZ in another language. (Here
XYZ stands for a specific section name mentioned below, such as "Acknowledgements",
"Dedications", "Endorsements", or "History".) To "Preserve the Title" of such a section when you
modify the Document means that it remains a section "Entitled XYZ" according to this definition.
The Document may include Warranty Disclaimers next to the notice which states that this License
applies to the Document. These Warranty Disclaimers are considered to be included by reference in
this License, but only as regards disclaiming warranties: any other implication that these Warranty
Disclaimers may have is void and has no effect on the meaning of this License.
104 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
GNU Free Documentation License
2. VERBATIM COPYING
You may copy and distribute the Document in any medium, either commercially or
noncommercially, provided that this License, the copyright notices, and the license notice saying this
License applies to the Document are reproduced in all copies, and that you add no other conditions
whatsoever to those of this License. You may not use technical measures to obstruct or control the
reading or further copying of the copies you make or distribute. However, you may accept
compensation in exchange for copies. If you distribute a large enough number of copies you must also
follow the conditions in section 3.
You may also lend copies, under the same conditions stated above, and you may publicly display
copies.
3. COPYING IN QUANTITY
If you publish printed copies (or copies in media that commonly have printed covers) of the
Document, numbering more than 100, and the Document's license notice requires Cover Texts, you
must enclose the copies in covers that carry, clearly and legibly, all these Cover Texts: Front-Cover
Texts on the front cover, and Back-Cover Texts on the back cover. Both covers must also clearly and
legibly identify you as the publisher of these copies. The front cover must present the full title with all
words of the title equally prominent and visible. You may add other material on the covers in addition.
Copying with changes limited to the covers, as long as they preserve the title of the Document and
satisfy these conditions, can be treated as verbatim copying in other respects.
If the required texts for either cover are too voluminous to fit legibly, you should put the first ones
listed (as many as fit reasonably) on the actual cover, and continue the rest onto adjacent pages.
If you publish or distribute Opaque copies of the Document numbering more than 100, you must
either include a machine-readable Transparent copy along with each Opaque copy, or state in or with
each Opaque copy a computer-network location from which the general network-using public has
access to download using public-standard network protocols a complete Transparent copy of the
Document, free of added material. If you use the latter option, you must take reasonably prudent steps,
when you begin distribution of Opaque copies in quantity, to ensure that this Transparent copy will
remain thus accessible at the stated location until at least one year after the last time you distribute an
Opaque copy (directly or through your agents or retailers) of that edition to the public.
It is requested, but not required, that you contact the authors of the Document well before
redistributing any large number of copies, to give them a chance to provide you with an updated
version of the Document.
4. MODIFICATIONS
You may copy and distribute a Modified Version of the Document under the conditions of sections
2 and 3 above, provided that you release the Modified Version under precisely this License, with the
Modified Version filling the role of the Document, thus licensing distribution and modification of the
Modified Version to whoever possesses a copy of it. In addition, you must do these things in the
Wikibooks | 105
Chapter 14
Modified Version:
A. Use in the Title Page (and on the covers, if any) a title distinct from that of the Document, and
from those of previous versions (which should, if there were any, be listed in the History section
of the Document). You may use the same title as a previous version if the original publisher of
that version gives permission.
B. List on the Title Page, as authors, one or more persons or entities responsible for authorship of
the modifications in the Modified Version, together with at least five of the principal authors of
the Document (all of its principal authors, if it has fewer than five), unless they release you from
this requirement.
C. State on the Title page the name of the publisher of the Modified Version, as the publisher.
D. Preserve all the copyright notices of the Document.
E. Add an appropriate copyright notice for your modifications adjacent to the other copyright
notices.
F. Include, immediately after the copyright notices, a license notice giving the public permission
to use the Modified Version under the terms of this License, in the form shown in the Addendum
below.
G. Preserve in that license notice the full lists of Invariant Sections and required Cover Texts
given in the Document's license notice.
H. Include an unaltered copy of this License.
I. Preserve the section Entitled "History", Preserve its Title, and add to it an item stating at least
the title, year, new authors, and publisher of the Modified Version as given on the Title Page. If
there is no section Entitled "History" in the Document, create one stating the title, year, authors,
and publisher of the Document as given on its Title Page, then add an item describing the
Modified Version as stated in the previous sentence.
J. Preserve the network location, if any, given in the Document for public access to a Transparent
copy of the Document, and likewise the network locations given in the Document for previous
versions it was based on. These may be placed in the "History" section. You may omit a network
location for a work that was published at least four years before the Document itself, or if the
original publisher of the version it refers to gives permission.
K. For any section Entitled "Acknowledgements" or "Dedications", Preserve the Title of the
section, and preserve in the section all the substance and tone of each of the contributor
acknowledgements and/or dedications given therein.
L. Preserve all the Invariant Sections of the Document, unaltered in their text and in their titles.
Section numbers or the equivalent are not considered part of the section titles.
M. Delete any section Entitled "Endorsements". Such a section may not be included in the
Modified Version.
N. Do not retitle any existing section to be Entitled "Endorsements" or to conflict in title with any
Invariant Section.
O. Preserve any Warranty Disclaimers.
If the Modified Version includes new front-matter sections or appendices that qualify as Secondary
Sections and contain no material copied from the Document, you may at your option designate some or
all of these sections as invariant. To do this, add their titles to the list of Invariant Sections in the
Modified Version's license notice. These titles must be distinct from any other section titles.
You may add a section Entitled "Endorsements", provided it contains nothing but endorsements of
your Modified Version by various parties--for example, statements of peer review or that the text has
been approved by an organization as the authoritative definition of a standard.
106 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
GNU Free Documentation License
You may add a passage of up to five words as a Front-Cover Text, and a passage of up to 25 words
as a Back-Cover Text, to the end of the list of Cover Texts in the Modified Version. Only one passage
of Front-Cover Text and one of Back-Cover Text may be added by (or through arrangements made by)
any one entity. If the Document already includes a cover text for the same cover, previously added by
you or by arrangement made by the same entity you are acting on behalf of, you may not add another;
but you may replace the old one, on explicit permission from the previous publisher that added the old
one.
The author(s) and publisher(s) of the Document do not by this License give permission to use their
names for publicity for or to assert or imply endorsement of any Modified Version.
5. COMBINING DOCUMENTS
You may combine the Document with other documents released under this License, under the
terms defined in section 4 above for modified versions, provided that you include in the combination
all of the Invariant Sections of all of the original documents, unmodified, and list them all as Invariant
Sections of your combined work in its license notice, and that you preserve all their Warranty
Disclaimers.
The combined work need only contain one copy of this License, and multiple identical Invariant
Sections may be replaced with a single copy. If there are multiple Invariant Sections with the same
name but different contents, make the title of each such section unique by adding at the end of it, in
parentheses, the name of the original author or publisher of that section if known, or else a unique
number. Make the same adjustment to the section titles in the list of Invariant Sections in the license
notice of the combined work.
In the combination, you must combine any sections Entitled "History" in the various original
documents, forming one section Entitled "History"; likewise combine any sections Entitled
"Acknowledgements", and any sections Entitled "Dedications". You must delete all sections Entitled
"Endorsements."
6. COLLECTIONS OF DOCUMENTS
You may make a collection consisting of the Document and other documents released under this
License, and replace the individual copies of this License in the various documents with a single copy
that is included in the collection, provided that you follow the rules of this License for verbatim
copying of each of the documents in all other respects.
You may extract a single document from such a collection, and distribute it individually under this
License, provided you insert a copy of this License into the extracted document, and follow this
License in all other respects regarding verbatim copying of that document.
7. AGGREGATION WITH INDEPENDENT WORKS
A compilation of the Document or its derivatives with other separate and independent documents
Wikibooks | 107
Chapter 14
or works, in or on a volume of a storage or distribution medium, is called an "aggregate" if the
copyright resulting from the compilation is not used to limit the legal rights of the compilation's users
beyond what the individual works permit. When the Document is included in an aggregate, this License
does not apply to the other works in the aggregate which are not themselves derivative works of the
Document.
If the Cover Text requirement of section 3 is applicable to these copies of the Document, then if
the Document is less than one half of the entire aggregate, the Document's Cover Texts may be placed
on covers that bracket the Document within the aggregate, or the electronic equivalent of covers if the
Document is in electronic form. Otherwise they must appear on printed covers that bracket the whole
aggregate.
8. TRANSLATION
Translation is considered a kind of modification, so you may distribute translations of the
Document under the terms of section 4. Replacing Invariant Sections with translations requires special
permission from their copyright holders, but you may include translations of some or all Invariant
Sections in addition to the original versions of these Invariant Sections. You may include a translation
of this License, and all the license notices in the Document, and any Warranty Disclaimers, provided
that you also include the original English version of this License and the original versions of those
notices and disclaimers. In case of a disagreement between the translation and the original version of
this License or a notice or disclaimer, the original version will prevail.
If a section in the Document is Entitled "Acknowledgements", "Dedications", or "History", the
requirement (section 4) to Preserve its Title (section 1) will typically require changing the actual title.
9. TERMINATION
You may not copy, modify, sublicense, or distribute the Document except as expressly provided
for under this License. Any other attempt to copy, modify, sublicense or distribute the Document is
void, and will automatically terminate your rights under this License. However, parties who have
received copies, or rights, from you under this License will not have their licenses terminated so long
as such parties remain in full compliance.
10. FUTURE REVISIONS OF THIS LICENSE
The Free Software Foundation may publish new, revised versions of the GNU Free Documentation
License from time to time. Such new versions will be similar in spirit to the present version, but may
differ in detail to address new problems or concerns. See http://www.gnu.org/copyleft/.
Each version of the License is given a distinguishing version number. If the Document specifies
that a particular numbered version of this License "or any later version" applies to it, you have the
option of following the terms and conditions either of that specified version or of any later version that
has been published (not as a draft) by the Free Software Foundation. If the Document does not specify
a version number of this License, you may choose any version ever published (not as a draft) by the
108 | Basic Physics of Nuclear Medicine
GNU Free Documentation License
Free Software Foundation.
External links
• GNU Free Documentation License (Wikipedia article on the license)
• Official GNU FDL webpage
Wikibooks | 109